# CHAPTER 1: **CREATIVE POWER  (THE CREATIVE)** 

CREATIVE POWER is nothing less than the detonating device in the evolutionary bomb. The time is exceptional in terms of inspiration, energy, and will. It could be compared to the generative power of creation when the sperm enters and quickens the egg. The force of this time is the primal directive that propels us into our destinies regardless of what our reasoning or recalcitrant minds may think.

All activities will now center around your imperatives. You can now catapult yourself and others into great and significant activity. Direct this new strength wisely. Choose endeavors that will be useful and inspiring to all of humanity. Righteous and worthwhile goals will meet with sublime success.

In political or business affairs you will now be seen as the leader or governing force. Others will look to you for guidance and counsel. You have the opportunity to bring your personal desires into accord with the needs of society, thereby creating order and peace. You can create functions and laws and organize others with ease, and, in doing so, cause them to prosper and find happiness. With your example those around you will develop their higher senses. This is therefore a time of unparalleled significance.

Cast away from yourself all random interferences and unorganized trivia. You must use this time wisely and not squander the extraordinary CREATIVE POWER available to you on undirected activities. Everything you do will now lead you to still greater goals, so you should carefully conserve and direct your resources. Skillful timing is a great factor in this. Alert yourself to the intricate signals of the time by being constantly poised for action while maintaining strict discrimination and integrity. Know where your actions will lead. Know when not to act. Such masterful and sagacious awareness is truly the mark of a superior person.

Personal relationships will center around you. Your family or mate will look to you for leadership. Confidently take the initiative. At the same time, within the Self, all growth is accelerated. Develop inner strength by adhering to noble principles and far-reaching objectives. Ignore unimportant or irrelevant considerations. Success is imminent and will not be held off.

 

# CHAPTER 2: **NATURAL RESPONSE (THE RECEPTIVE)**

The yielding and responsive quality of nature is the focus of this time. Nature follows with sensitivity the demands of the seasons. It reproduces, adapts, and evolves itself appropriately; it heals itself when injured and deftly maintains a balanced economy. Nature is the responsive, yielding background for all events on earth. The power of this time lies in reacting with a NATURAL RESPONSE to the myriad things around you, a response in keeping with the laws of nature.

At this time you are dealing With realities rather than potentials. You can know only the situation around you but not the forces behind it. Therefore you should not act independently or try to lead others. If you do, you will lose the way and become confused. Because you are not connected to the forces at work in the situation, you need friends and helpers to accomplish your aims. If you can accept this you will find guidance. Once you respond naturally and allow yourself to be led, even the greatest goals can be attained.

By maintaining a pose of NATURAL RESPONSE even in the complex matters of business and politics, you can be assured that you are attuned to your own nature. At this time, such an attitude is of singular importance in your relations with worldly affairs. Through the help of friends and associates, you will be led into the best possible position. Above all, restrain the impulse to lead assertively in these situations.

You can begin to rely too much upon your own strength and forget that strength can be perilous when not directed properly. This time is a subtle study in nonaction as a way of attaining real meaning in your life. Relationships will be a test of this concept. It is important now to be particularly feeling and receptive of those dear to you. Allow them to take the initiative and assume the lead. Hold, at this time, to traditional values in the managing of interpersonal affairs and avoid aggressive attempts to get your way.

Within your Self, spend time alone in objective thought as you consider the direction of your life. Meditate upon the idea that everything on earth, good and evil, is supported by nature. Strive to broaden your attitudes and opinions and view the world with an open mind. Objectivity will keep your NATURAL RESPONSE pure while it gives you great stamina of character and inner calm in dealing with the outside world.

 

# CHAPTER 3: **DIFFICULT BEGINNINGS**

The birth of every new venture begins in some confusion because we are entering the realm of the unknown. For this reason, a wrong step in the beginning can render the entire situation hopeless. Although this hexagram suggests nothing less than complete chaos, it ultimately presages a time of order and efficiency. Just as the tumultuous chaos of a thunderstorm brings a nurturing rain that allows life to flourish, so too in human affairs times of advanced organization are preceded by times of disorder. Success comes to those who can weather this storm while maintaining their principles.

DIFFICULT BEGINNINGS arise where there are a profusion of elements struggling to take form. You are facing such a situation. Because your new environment has yet to wholly materialize, much confusion surrounds any attempt to master it. Concentrate now on current problems, particularly in worldly affairs. The foundation upon which you will build all new ventures must be consolidated. In the meantime, do not attempt to break new ground. Your hands are full with myriad details that must be secured before you expand further. During DIFFICULT BEGINNINGS it is of utmost wisdom to hire able employees to assist you in your current business objectives. If you then continue to participate personally in your endeavors, you are promised supreme success.

This is a time when things are struggling to take form in the Self as well. DIFFICULT BEGINNINGS may mark an identity crisis, which could manifest as confusion, indecision, or new tastes and desires. Accept these changes in your Self without combating them. Meanwhile, look for examples of your desires so you will know where you are headed. Seek advice freely, but do not take it upon yourself to embark on new projects or untried ventures. Hold now to your own center and allow fate to manipulate external events. It will take all of the energy and powers of concentration you possess just to organize the profusion of information coming your way.

Confusion and disorder reign in personal relationships and there is little you can do about it. Remain calm during this new phase in your emotional life. Look outside the relationship for guidance. Whether professional or just friendly advice is sought, the very act of taking difficulties elsewhere will help you sort things out successfully. Remember, DIFFICULT BEGINNINGS is a phase of growth, and growing pains are in abundance. Yet, enduring this time with perseverance brings gratifying success.

# CHAPTER 4: **INEXPERIENCE (YOUTHFUL FOLLY)**

You are able to competently handle just about every facet of your life, except for the one facing you now. You have had enough experience in the twists and turns of your fate, and the inner workings of your nature, to dispense with most new situations that come your way, with the exception of this one. Your confusion over the difficulties and complexities of the coming event is not caused by ignorance, evil, or laziness, but rather by your complete INEXPERIENCE in dealing with such matters. Yet the time of INEXPERIENCE can bring you success because you are now forced to grow, to gain new insights, and to further develop your character.

First, know that you do not know what to do, then act accordingly. If you will not admit that there is something you must learn, you cannot be taught. And the time indicates that there is something, indeed, that you must discover. Look for an experienced teacher and seek his counsel and wisdom. Asking for help at this time is important in two ways. First, you will demonstrate to others that you are a willing and receptive pupil, thereby attracting information; and second, the process of requesting instruction will develop in you a useful predisposition toward the continued cultivation of your character. Life is a process of constant movement, change, and growth. There is no way to halt the process without ending it. This inevitable growth, without proper cultivation and guidance, can become distorted and lopsided.

Therefore, when seeking instruction, be certain that you are prepared to find, request, and use it properly. Approach a teacher who is clearly wiser in the matter causing you consternation and request advice with an open and humble attitude. If you cannot fully understand the advice you receive, or if it is not what you expected to hear, you may attribute this to your general INEXPERIENCE. If you knew the answer, you would not need to ask. You are dealing with a blind spot within your  Self. Benefit from the experience of your teacher, for it is the only resource you have. And, above all, don't argue with your adviser. If you attempt to force him to justify his entire reasoning process you may alienate your teacher at a time when you desperately need help.

If you are an adviser of others, this hexagram will demonstrate to you, as well as the seeker, the proper attitude in such exchanges. If your pupil is not serious, is argumentative, or does not listen, do not waste your energies. Attend to other more important issues in your busy world.

 

# CHAPTER 5: **CALCULATED WAITING**

A period of CALCULATED WAITING must pass before the cosmos can address itself to your needs. Many areas are undergoing significant change. Shifting powers are generating new ideas, animosities are appearing, alliances are forming, systems are breaking down, and collective causes are being organized. It is the eternal flux of change as manifested in human affairs.

That which you desire is caught in this change. In essence, it is a dangerous time, since the elements involved are not directly under your control. You may be facing some kind of threat or awaiting the outcome of a decision that could greatly affect you. If you worry about it you will grow inwardly confused and succumb to chaos and fear. You will waste valuable energy through agitation. When the time does come to act, your judgment may be impaired.

In order to attain your aim, you must wait to act until circumstances are in your favor. Inwardly bide your time and nourish and strengthen yourself for the future. Through careful observation attempt to see things without illusions or fears. Face the facts. If you are aware of your shortcomings and advantages, you will know what to do when the time comes. Ultimately you will meet with success.

In the meantime, the way that you conduct yourself outwardly is of great importance in the outcome of the situation. The time of CALCULATED WAITING will put your confidence to a test. It is now that you must make a show of confidence. Do not express your doubts about the past or the future. Indulge totally in the present. Keep your thoughts and words on a positive note and maintain an assured and cheerful attitude. In this way you will win the confidence of others and fortify your own certainty.

An external approach to inner development can be compared to yoga practices. By adopting certain physical postures of balance and discipline, a resonant chord is struck in the spirit. Such an alignment between the internal and the external creates a more sensitive consciousness, a certain enlightened awareness, and an overall healthy atmosphere.

In groups or relationships, all parties are involved in a situation that requires CALCULATED and good-natured WAITING. Those involved should realize that the situation is out of any one person's hands. Destiny is at work here. Any action would be a foolish overreaction, so nourish one another with cheerfulness and reassurance instead.

 

# CHAPTER 6: **CONFLICT**

In your heart you are certain that your proposed path is correct. You feel yourself to be in the right, and therefore you proceed with complete confidence. In fact, you are acting in accordance with your own nature and the dictates of the time. This path you have chosen, however, will lead you into a state of CONFLICT. Obstacles and opposition will rise up in front of you, and there is no way to circumvent them. Whether these are inner obstacles or external oppositions, they represent a formidable countermovement, since, from their point of view, they too are correct. This CONFLICT will cause you to stop and reconsider your original premise.

It would have been wise to cautiously weigh all of the possible difficulties and oppositions at the beginning of your endeavors. Such careful considerations are the only way to avoid debilitating CONFLICT which can bring your efforts to a standstill. As it is, you cannot engage in confrontation with your adversaries, for this would lead to misfortune. All such aggressive or cunning strategies will come to evil.

In questions of power or politics, it would be in your best interests to place the CONFLICT before an impartial authority who can make un unprejudiced decision. In this way you can bring discord to a halt before it becomes injurious. If you have planned an ambitious enterprise or have a goal of significance in mind, you would be advised to begin again at another time.

Business matters cannot be brought to fruition at this time. The competition is too great, and even carefully planned objectives will end in CONFLICT. You may meet with unfavorable reactions to ideas or products you thought to be totally acceptable. It would be best to hold back major changes or innovations until the time is more auspicious.

At a time when social unity is most important it is significantly lacking. There are misunderstandings brought about by basic philosophical differences and they cannot be overcome with forceful measures. Avoid controversial topics unless there is present a wise mediator who is trusted by all concerned. Social events of importance cannot be staged with any real success. If you can avoid them, do so.

Try to stay away from open confrontations in your personal relationships. It would be better to yield to those close to you rather than involve yourself in disagreements for which there is no ultimate resolution. A third person or disinterested party might now bring some insight to a CONFLICT of emotional interests. Above all, don't make any major decisions or demands based upon your own point of view. Although you may feel that your position is above reproach, you are dealing with only one side of the issue. Hold back and re-examine your original feelings.

In terms of inner development, your natural growth and patterns of interest have met with undeniable opposition. The time is one of spiritual maturing. Do not force the issue. A cautious yielding now leads to good fortune. 

# CHAPTER 7: **COLLECTIVE FORCE (THE ARMY)**

When an object has mass, it is said to have gravity. The denser its mass, the greater the dynamic force of its gravity. Within our own solar system, a large planet like Jupiter attracts with a powerful force nearly three times that of our smaller earth. This forceful law of gravity and masses, effective throughout all the cosmos, is significantly effective among large masses of people as they focus the awesome strength of their COLLECTIVE FORCE.

The time of COLLECTIVE FORCE requires great discipline, organization, and righteous aims. Those in authority must have confidence in you, and you must gain support from the people around you as you continue in your endeavors. This energy of mass support can be tapped now if you are communicating effectively and if your goals are in accordance with the sentiments of society.

Supportiveness and generosity toward others can accomplish the difficult task of uniting the masses. Originally titled The Army, this hexagram points to the necessity of organizing and experiencing this COLLECTIVE FORCE, although it warns against using it for dangerous warlike purposes unless there exists no other alternative. Clearly, a strong leader is required for this task, while the time is especially auspicious for those in positions of authority. People can now be most effectively led through education, generosity, and leniency. At the same time they must be inspired by a noble vision and impressed by firm principles.

Any venture now requires a strong inner conviction of your correctness. You must assume that you are acting with the COLLECTIVE FORCE behind you. If you feel unconnected from your society then you must make it a point to find and experience this powerful resource inherent in humanity. Naturally, this takes exceptional awareness and determination, but the strong man who achieves this will meet with good fortune.

Be generous now and accommodating in your personal relationships. Try to see your roles together in the context of all of humanity. A more philosophical point of view can do wonders at this time, whereas a focus upon the more eccentric aspects of your relationships can lead you astray. Hold together with your loved ones and attempt to overcome any difficulties with the gravity of your COLLECTIVE FORCE. This force is the basis of organization and continuity, whether in a solar system or in a love affair.

Ultimately, in matters of your external relationships you must always return to the center of the Self for orientation and processing. This is a fine time to broaden your ideals to encompass larger goals — the goals of all of mankind. This will eventually strengthen your ability to call upon the COLLECTIVE FORCE in dangerous times. Concurrently, you will also hear the call of this force as it grows, changes, and informs.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 8: **UNITY**

As a part of civilization, man is also a product of civilization. (HOLDING He shares TOGETHER)with the other members certain intrinsic experiences peculiar to his community. This creates in turn a bond of language, order, and tradition, which are the foundations for the progress and evolution of both the community and the individual. His relationships to his immediate society may be many and varied. He may feel rebellious or conservative, apathetic or highly conscious, he may be lauded or incarcerated. Whatever his circumstances, he is inexorably a member of the social order.

You are surrounded at this time by an awareness of your society. Whatever your inquiry, you must first address yourself to this issue. It is of great importance that the need for creating UNITY is recognized. The individual human spirit is nourished by a sense of connectedness to the whole of human awareness. This perspective will enhance your sense of direction. You will be able to glimpse yourself as a part of a whole, which will both amplify your individuality and annihilate it. Do not fear this, for it will not diminish your self-awareness but rather spotlight it against a more profound background.

The Chinese text urges that on some level UNITY takes place when opportunities first arise. These are important experiences in the development of character. If you continue to ignore these opportunities you are more and more excluded from

your community and rendered ineffectual in terms of influence: Not only will you have little to say, but also very few will be listening. Whether you interpret this as voting in an upcoming election, joining a public-minded organization, attending or supporting a cultural event, or simply adopting a more responsible attitude about your neighborhood, now is the time to act. In interpersonal affairs, look both within the relationship for UNITY and beyond it for its meaning within society. There is a time for exclusivity and a time for social UNITY and productivity.

This hexagram has another equally important aspect: It may be that an opportunity has presented itself for you to be the leader of UNITY, to gather the members of society together, to influence them, to advance them. Keep in mind that this position requires great responsibility, virtue, and a true sense of purpose. If you are not up to such a role and yet endeavor to undertake it, you will create only chaos and confusion.

So important does the I Ching regard this role that it suggests that one who feels such a calling consult the oracle once again to determine the state of his character, the integrity of his motives, and his harmony with the cosmos.

 

# CHAPTER 9: **RESTRAINED** (THE TAMING POWER OF THE SMALL)

It is as if your strong impulses, good intentions, and serious plans were held in check by some unknown external detail.. With some frustration, you can see all of the necessary elements in the attainment of your goals; yet nothing fits together the way it must. In every way you try, you are RESTRAINED from taking significant action. The ancient Chinese described this hexagram as "Dense clouds, no rain," a singularly unfulfilling situation. However, there is some promise of mild success through small, gentle improvements. Grand schemes are out of the question.

You may now only exercise the most brief and gentle of influences over others. The powers of the status quo are formidable and not to be tampered with. Your best plan, during these RESTRAINED times, is to stay close to the situation you wish to affect. Use the forces of friendly persuasion to maintain what influence you have and to keep the situation from running away without you. Quell any impulses to take aggressive measures.

As you may have already discovered, this is a poor time for new business ventures. Even though prospects may look promising, it will be best to wait for the signs of a sure success. In the meantime, attend to the details of the business at hand. Improve the appearance or format of your product but do not attempt to introduce a sweeping modification. In this way you will still be around when the situation is no longer RESTRAINED.

It is going to take great skillfulness to achieve a successful outcome in personal relationships. You have no control over the affair whatsoever, and arguments or ultimatums can accomplish nothing. Your choice is either to acquiesce and wait out the RESTRAINED atmosphere in a friendly manner, or to depart from the relationship altogether.

However, rather than anguishing over these conflicts, your time would be best spent in improving your image. Exercise restraint over your opinions and belief systems and put your energies into your effect upon others. Try to anticipate what facet of your personality you can display to give you the greatest advantage over your environment. This then becomes your major asset and device of persuasion during times when significant influence is unlikely. There is, nevertheless, a prospect for ultimate success if you can restrain yourself until the situation can accommodate your plan.

 

# CHAPTER 10: **CONDUCT**

This can be a brilliant and inspiring time. It can also be a time of danger. Everything depends upon the way that you CONDUCT yourself. The best possibility for progress and success comes through your sense of dignity and composure. Disorder and chaos cannot touch you if you behave with propriety and good manners.

Pay special attention to your CONDUCT in social affairs. When in doubt, maintain your dignity. You may suddenly come face to face with the necessity of becoming truly discriminating in your choice of acquaintances. The process of social readjustment is in the air. Some are climbing. Some are falling. It's a natural occurrence. No one will be hurt. These cycles of balance and discrimination, based upon the inner worth of the individuals involved, will bring order and progress to society.

When you are dealing with matters of business, you must CONDUCT yourself with great care and dignity. Persons below you may make a bold approach or perhaps an unexpected advance. Base your reactions upon the inner worth of these people, and your authority will not be challenged. In this way you can avoid incompetence caused by prejudice or eccentric whims on your part. If you, yourself, are embarking on ambitious endeavors you may find success in your pursuits. Stick to traditional behavior patterns, however, in spite of your daring.

The time is truly difficult in personal relationships. Consider now the goals and desires of those close to you. If there are misunderstandings or confusion, maintain your composure. Good fortune comes through conducting yourself with thoughtfulness and courtesy. If you or your loved ones are contemplating a wild emotional move, whatever the circumstances, it is now ill advised. By bringing a little dignity into your relationships you can create an atmosphere for emotional growth and progress.

In terms of general attitude, maintain your composure at all costs. The way that you CONDUCT yourself now will determine the outcome of any external situation. You can avoid poor health brought about by stress if you adopt a good-natured outlook. Above all, use this time to develop a sense of your own Self worth. Take note of your outstanding character traits and continue to cultivate your inner growth in the direction of these worthier virtues.

 

# CHAPTER 11: **PROSPERING (PEACE)**

The time resembles the exciting beginning of spring, when the cosmic forces are in inspired harmony. There presently exist the ideal conditions for new awakenings, healthy growth, and progressive plans. It is a totally co-operative environmental setting that leads to the flowering and PROSPERING of what is now aroused.

When spring comes to any situation, the superior man uses his awareness of this cosmic signal to cultivate the fertile ground presented. He separates, regulates, controls, and limits the rich beginnings so as to shape the future and organize his life. It is possible now for strong and good ideas to advance the situation while reforming the inferior and degenerating elements of the past.

Your interactions with others can be exceptionally fruitful. If you have avoided social situations in the recent past, you should now feel confident about making contacts. There is an end to animosities as mistrust and factionalism depart and good feelings prevail. The exchange of good influences can create the structure for a PROSPERING social environment.

Many things will become possible as the wisest leaders move with ease into ruling positions. Such men are so magnanimous and progressive that even the most evil elements change for the better. Because of the correct and harmonious nature of the cosmic forces present, it is an excellent time for making useful laws and developing advanced systems of order. Success then comes easily to all the individual members of a PROSPERING government.

Business situations will experience a most direct benefit from this fortunate time. Use the PROSPERING environment to bring organization to your endeavors. The current clarity, like the beginning of spring, lends itself to the initiation of systems that will continue to benefit, even in hard times. Service organizations and people who work with others will make particularly significant gains at this time.

Within the Self, the focus is on inner harmony. The outward aspect of your nature will reflect a certain peace that comes from the PROSPERING of the spirit. There exists now a harmonious accord between your instincts and the cosmic forces. Your most innocent actions will benefit yourself and others. Your personal relationships may remain the same externally, but your attitude will significantly improve. At the same time, your physical well-being will benefit. You will feel a new strength developing as weakening and degenerative elements depart. Generally, this time brings a peace of mind, which alone creates an all-encompassing atmosphere for success and prosperity.

 

 

# CHAPTER 12: **STAGNATION**

The forces in nature are in a state of perfect and undiscriminating impasse. There is no responsive action between things, and nothing productive can be accomplished. The natural order that nourishes and fosters all things is disjointed and disunited. The lines of comtnunication are down. Because of this there is no understanding of what is needed. and growth cannot continue. When growth stops, STAGNATION begins.

Any useful insights or ideas you may have will be met with apathy or rejection. lhe atmosphere of your environment is unreceptive even to altruistic and unselfish energies on your part. The problem is not in your motives. Whether you seek to turn a quick profit, or volunteer the whole of your resources to a worthwhile social cause, you can accomplish nothing. STAGNATION is a reservoir of arbitrary and absurd misunderstandings.

STAGNATION produces an ambiance of decay and decadence. Inferior persons and ideas can rise to positions of great influence. The political and social environment can become corrupt indeed, and there is little a person of principle can do to turn the tide of events. Leaders are not in touch with the people whom they lead, and social systems become irrelevant. The people become lost in a labyrinth of discordant purpose and are filled with mistrust. Things come to a standstill and people, therefore, cannot be helped.

Your social life may ebb due to a lack of meaningful discourse. Artistic endeavors, touted as brilliant or avant-garde, will seem to you inferior and lacking in inspiration. Or perhaps truly inspired works will be completely overlooked by your milieu. Do not doubt your inner vision or ethics. STAGNATION is a difficult time and, in reality, there is nothing you can do. If you participate in public activities you will resonate with the atmosphere and become stagnant yourself. You must, at all costs, avoid the confusion that comes when there is absolute discord in the cosmos. Withdraw.

Do not attempt to influence others, for this is not possible. Do not compromise your principles or alter your standards, for there is no end to the chaos and nothing reasonable can be resolved. You will be pulled farther and farther into multifarious disorder. Do not be tempted by promises of rewards or extravagant remunerations in return for your participation in a stagnant situation. The cost to your integrity will be too dear. Instead, you must conceal your convictions and remove yourself from any situation that will cause you conflict until the time of STAGNATION passes.

Relationships will be difficult at this time and you may, in fact, be adrift ina sea of misunderstandings and miscommunications. Hold courageously and unobtrusively to your values and inner confidence, for these times will certainly pass. This is true in matters of health as well. Self-reliance will see you through. 


# CHAPTER 13: **COMMUNITY (FELLOWSHIP WITH MEN)** 

Society functions at its very best when each member finds security in his place within the social structure. When all members can be gainfully employed, yet have individual initiative, when they can excel in their own craft, and in doing so contribute to the overall goals of society, then there exists harmony and a sense of COMMUNITY. When the members have an interest in the continuity of their COMMUNITY, great deeds can be accomplished. This is because the many work for the one.

Whether you live and function in the midst of society, or whether you have created for yourself a life outside of the mainstream, you are affected by all social considerations: by the traditions of the COMMUNITY, by its economy, and by its laws. In the overall scope of evolution, the desirability of becoming self-sufficient and independent and living outside of society is as unfeasible as it is archaic. The benefits of isolation at this time are questionable. Therefore you must now evaluate your life and your goals in the light of the needs of your COMMUNITY.

It may be that you are in a position to help organize your COMMUNITY. This role requires great strength of character and the complete elimination of all selfserving motives. The time is beneficial for the attainment of social aims, yet this benefit will be lost with selfish interests and separatist endeavors. When organizing others, it is necessary to assign each member his place within the group. Without order, rank, and system the gathering would become a mere mingling and little could be accomplished. Make intelligent, thoughtful discriminations of the various talents of others. Put each person where he will most effectively function and at the same time find satisfaction in his work. Do not assume that this will just "happen." If the needs of humanity are to be met there must be a superior leader to instill social order. If you are, instead, a member of the COMMUNITY, maintain a consistent and principled attitude about your craft or job. Your own promised success at this time will serve as an example and thereby will benefit others as well as yourself.

Generally, it is a fine time for new endeavors. The forces present in this hexagram favor the creation of structures, mechanisms, and healthy disciplines necessary for the unified attainment of ambitious deeds, particularly when these deeds are aligned to and serve the needs of your fellow man.

The family is a microcosm of the COMMUNITY, and here too you should concern yourself with the direction of your personal goals. Are they consonant with the well-being of those dear to you? This is not the time to strike out as an individual.

 

# CHAPTER 14: **SOVEREIGNTY (POSSESSION IN GREAT MEASURE)**

Because of a stroke of good fortune you will meet with supreme success. At few times do you possess more. Seldom are you able to receive as much. Your position has become one of authority within the situation of your inquiry, yet you continue in an attitude of unassutning modesty. With such an attitude you pose no threat to those around you and they. therefore. loyally align themselves to your authority. Thus you are granted SOVEREIGNTY, This power should be controlled with moderation and modesty, leading you into a state of great progress and potential,

You are in the spotlight, exposed to the view of both those you lead and those abcm• you: Therefore proper behavior is necessary in order to continue in your accomplishments. Keep your ego in check. Never forget that things move to change at the first sign of imbalance. Your values must be realistic. Examine yourself for signs of pride, which are inappropriate to someone in a position of SOVEREIGNTY You must now fight to suppress evil in yourself and in the general situation by adhering to things that are good. Your strength comes through your alignment to the cosmic order in which good and evil find their proper places.\*

Your dealings in worldly affairs will meet with success. This might mean material wealth. Even your superiors wisely acquiesce to your SOVEREIGNTY as you continue in your progress. With an unselfish attitude and goals that place emphasis on cultural achievements, you will realize the greatest rewards.

In social matters, even the strongest members of your community will defer to you. With gentleness and goodness you will win their hearts. Through compassion — that is, identifying with others and finding the possibilities of their weaknesses within yourself — you move them to loyalty and gain their obedience. If you are an artist, your creative inspirations are now relevant to your culture, and you will meet with great success. Furthermore, your personal relationships, although lacking in passion, are well ordered. Here too you hold the position of SOVEREIGNTY and, if you are kind and unselfish, your relationships will flower.

Within the Self, SOVEREIGNTY may be a burden as well as a blessing. When experiencing material successes, you most easily fall victim to such vices as pride, greed, and immodesty. You must now make special efforts to curb any attitudes that will lead to humiliation and thus weaken your character. Instead, focus your attention upon those qualities in yourself that enhance your goodness.

 

 

# CHAPTER 15: **MODERATION (MODESTY)**

The predominant forces in the cosmog at this time are in the process of balancing extremes and harmonizing interests. This tendency toward equilibrium and MODERA TION is n natural urge in the universe. In the terrain of the earth, pinnacles are in the process of wearing down and valleys are filling up. Extreme poles magnetize and attract their opposites, thus neutralizing and moderating themselves. Nature balances itself with plagues, droughts, and cycles of overabundance, and human nature strives toward MODERATION in its tendency to reduce the excesses of the overpowerful and to augment the needs of those who are desperately wanting.

Worldly matters can now be brought to success through MODERATION. Leaders should strive to firmly carry their objectives through to completion, not with a show of extraordinary force but with the continuing sincerity that springs from their true natures. Confucius says of this idea. "When a man enters public life he does not change from what he was in private life. How unflinching is his strength\!" The self-evident, self-actualizing demonstration of purpose is the mark of great

In social relationships, avoid extremes. People who are overly intelligent or overly ignorant tend to extremes in their behavior and attitudes. You should now concentrate upon establishing a harmonious equilibrium with your fellow man and bring MODERATION and order to social institutions. This not only means avoiding radicalism and ostentatious values but also tolerating weaknesses and inferior elements. "Everything in moderation" means just that.

This is a good time to bring some equilibrium to your more personal relationships. Examine your deepest feelings and see if you are harboring any extremes in your expectations or selfish desires in your motivations. Try to moderate any unrealistic ideals.

Your inner development now requires a modest and sincere attitude. Do not indulge in extremes of any sort, and instead strive for MODERATION in all you do.\* It must be understood that acting with MODERATION means not only limiting the obvious excesses, but also exposing yourself to new areas of experience. Through MODERATION you can now gain some real control over your destiny. In this way you use the balancing tendency of the current forces to center yourself. This inner equilibrium aligns you with the tao, thus bringing you into harmony with forces that can work for you.

 

 

# CHAPTER 16: **HARMONIZE (ENTHUSIASM)**

All events in nature follow the path of least resistance and harmonious natural order. Rivers cut through the most yielding areas in their downward rush to the oceans. The tides rhythmically undulate to the pull of the moon, while the moon orbits on the tether of the earth's gravity. The earth is held in check on its axis by the sun, and there follow the seasons in fixed regularity. All things in life HARMONIZEwith these laws and patterns, including the myriad affairs of man.

Within society there are fixed traditions, popular opinions, and irresistible sympathies that instinctively spring from the nature of mankind. When you wish to lead, influence, govern, or arouse others, you must first align your values to those held by society. In this way you gain the attention, enthusiasm, and co-operation of others. Prohibitions that run contrary to the sentiment and life-style of people create resentment. Unpopular wars cannot be waged without shattering the public spirit and causing disharmony.

During this time you should seek to analyze the essential nature of the moment. If you can grasp the direction of the tendencies around you, you can parallel them and accomplish great deeds. New ideas, inventions, and innovations can now be successfully developed and promoted. Penetrate the popular sentiment of society, anticipate what will be needed and supported, and choose able helpers who will be enthusiastically attracted to your compelling inspiration.

The Chinese compared this time to the composition of music. The persuasive and mathematical purity of harmony in music inspires the hearts of the listeners ina mass experience. The forceful mystery of this tonal relationship can be demonstrated as an invisible language of our perceptions of reality. The profound experiences of art, education, history, healing, religion, and patriotism are expressed in music. People are inspired, in times of harmonizing, to feelings of universal perfection and truth. So powerful are these moments of perfect harmony that Confucius was prompted to say: "He who could wholly comprehend this sacrifice could rule the world as though it were spinning on his hand."

This hexagram suggests that you are now able to HARMONIZE socially and communicate fully your ideas and interests. Your general resonance with the mood of the time should make you particularly charismatic in your personal relationships.

You can now readily put yourself in touch with your true nature in order to further the development of your character. Pay attention to your bodily rhythms, observe your inherent character traits, and listen to your inner voice. Moreover, this state of mind can enhance your health and well-being. You can instill in your body an enthusiasm for life by harmonizing your spirit with the cosmic order.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 17: **ADAPTING (FOLLOWING)**

When autumn approaches. all of life that continues to survive begins an adaptation to the season. The pelts of animals begin to thicken in anticipation of the winter, while the seeds of plants scatter themselves in autumn winds to await the spring. The bark of the tree increases to protect itself from the cold, while insects may burrow deep inside to hibernate. By ADAPTING to the forces, life is protected as it rests and restores itself for new activity.

ADAPTING is knowing when to act and when to rest, when to speak and when to be silent. The nature of this hexagram is compared to the time of autumn when activity ebbs and rest begins. This is not a restraint, for there is no stress involved. It is instead a peaceful, accepting frame of mind willing to adjust to the existing forces. You should now concern yourself with doing the best you possibly can under the circumstances. Leave the control of the situation to others. Even if you feel you possess the strength to alter events, it is in your best interests to remain low. True power lies in serving others, and with such behavior comes progress and success.

In worldly matters, only leaders who adapt their vision to the sentiments of society will be followed. If their ideals are too far from the popular mainstream of reality, if they are not ADAPTING their product or service in the interests of the times, then following them can lead to danger. However, if their goals are harmonious with the times, you may commit yourself to their leadership. When you follow another, you may relax and restore yourself.

Try to be flexible in your social and personal relationships and, if necessary, subordinate yourself. It is correct to adapt to the situation presented now, for this is the only way that there will be favorable progress. Do not waste your energies struggling against the predominant forces. Instead, make your relationships as rewarding as possible by ADAPTING yourself to the current mood.

Rid yourself of old prejudices and opinions that may be controlling your behavior and holding you back. If your goals and principles are not consonant with those of your society, then you must make an adjustment in yourself. Your progress now depends upon the reality of your milieu. You may live by your own rules in your own home, but once outside, you must adapt. By ADAPTING to the realities around you at this time, you will find peace of mind and success.

 

 

# 

# CHAPTER 18: **REPAIR (DECAY)** 

The object of your inquiry is in a state of disrepair. This may be an inherited difficulty or it may have come about because you have been unaware of a need to constantly monitor, analyze, and attend to the details of the situation. You cannot ignore, or discount as unimportant, even the smallest detail of any situation over which you wish to maintain control. All things have built-in weak points, places that decay and eventually collapse. This is especially visible in human affairs.

Stop now and think about it. Your problems may seem to be overwhelming; things may appear to be out of hand. Yet the hexagram REPAIR bodes great success. Through work you have the opportunity to totally eliminate the past indifference that has created the present uncomfortable situation. Work hard. You can see the problems clearly. The timing is excellent for making amends. Do not be afraid to take assertive action. Outside forces do not influence the situation. Your own past attitude has allowed the damage to occur, making you uniquely equipped to REPAIR it.

Before taking action, it is important to consider the winding path that has led to this state of decay. Only through intelligent deliberation can you be certain that the action you take is correct. Think it over carefully. The original Chinese text recommends three days of consideration before making a move, but you will know when to act by the nature of what you propose to do. The correct actions now are constructive rather than combative and lay the foundation for continued growth toward the good. This is not a time for radical or reactionary reforms. Look, instead, for an avenue of constructive action, an area of positive growth. Be energetic once you've found your path of action. Don't be lulled into inertia by the magnitude of the task. The situation will develop new energy and inspiration once the problems are removed. Also remember that you must keep things in line once the change has been made. Don't slip back into an attitude of complacency. Your problems could easily recur.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 19: **PROMOTION** (APPROACH)

Ote time is one of immediate PROMOTION, The Chinese correlated this hexagram to the end of winter and the very beginning of spring. Like the sprout of a new plant shooting forth its first burst of creative activity, you can now make your first positive advancements toward the attainment of your goal.

If your concerns are directed toward matters of politics or power, this will be a most rewarding moment. A PROMOTION of your abilities or talents will now put you in the spotlight of events. At the same time, you will find yourself in a position of authority. You will be able to skillfully influence and support others. It would be wise to address yourself to the concerns of those around you, thus consolidating your position in society. This tremendously positive time will not last forever, so you must use it to its best advantage. The original text of the hexagram states: "When the eighth month comes there will be misfortune." This refers to the decline of autumn, which lies unavoidably ahead. Therefore you should make the most of this spring of power and optimism to prepare yourself for the natural cycle of decline.

There is a PROMOTION on the horizon in the affairs of business. If you have been waiting for an opportune moment to put forth a new idea or to maneuver yourself into a better position, the time has come. Those in authority have never been more receptive toward you. Great progress is a real possibility, and financial affairs are in your control as well. Use these advantages to make gains now and prepare for the future.

In your social world you have "arrived." Your charisma is powerful and you are able to influence and teach others to improve their own outlooks. This PROMOTION in social prominence should be used to enhance and invigorate your entire environment, thus preparing a secure foundation for any cultural regressions.

Relationships have the potential to blossom and you may find yourself in the role of the assertive partner. Your input can create the atmosphere for the strengthening of personal bonds. The time is most inspiring in matters of the heart because things are at their very beginning of development. Be tolerant and caring and you can build a structure that will weather those stormier emotional encounters that are a part of any relationship.

There is now a dynamic emphasis on inner growth. You will gain great clarity about your identity and your place in the larger scheme of things. Physical and spiritual strength will be enhanced as you sense a PROMOTION into new worlds of self-realization. Try to develop a permanent perspective of the confidence you are now experiencing to guide you through upcoming confusion or depression.

 

# CHAPTER 20: **CONTEMPLATING**

The seasons of the year flow into one another with fixed regularity, deviating only within themselves but never in relation to one another. This regular pattern is evident in all phenomena from the movements of the solar system to the migration habits of the animals. All matter in the cosmos is subject to the same cyclic laws, the fates of civilizations and individuals being no exception. Therefore, by CONTEMPLATING the cosmic laws and their effects on both your life and the lives of others, you can gain an insight into the unfolding patterns of events. This perspective is extremely powerful, and the gifted individual can use it to master himself and his environment.

Just as the life of the individual is composed of seasons, the spring of inspiration, the summer of work, the autumn of completion and the winter of rest and contemplation, so too worldly events have their seasons. When attempting to determine the meaning and tendency of a situation at this time, approach it with the predictable plan of the seasons in mind. By CONTEMPLATING the present situation and taking note of what immediately preceded it, you should be able to determine what will follow.

The inherent ability to predict such tendencies is difficult to accept because one rarely sees what one desires. Yet the individual who can courageously and objectively contemplate in this way masters his world. He then becomes a part of the cosmic law, reacting instinctively and appropriately. Those around him are swept along by the force of his presence. Such a person is a true leader, for he leads not with force, but with divine inspiration.

Take this time of CONTEMPLATING to move freely through society. Experience new ideas fully, then offer your advice. Others will now listen eagerly to what you have to say. In matters of business, your ideas will have true impact. Use this opportunity to explore, contemplate, and modify any practices or policies that seem unsuitable. Your example, through honest contemplation, will create trust among your associates.

Your personal relationships will develop smoothly because you can grasp what is needed and respond properly. Through unity and co-operation you can expand these relationships into new areas of personal and social importance.

Keep in mind that at this time you are being contemplated by others as well. When you are in touch with the forces and laws of the cosmos, your position will become as prominent and obvious as your influence. The higher you rise in an attempt to see and contemplate, the more visible you become.

 

 

# CHAPTER 21: **REFORM (BITING THROUGH)** 

The time calls for energetic REFORM. Either an inferior person who is working against you or a situation that has developed at cross purposes to your life is interfering with the attainment of your aims. These obstacles must be sought out, reformed, and thereby eliminated. Success will come through the enforcement of laws and the administering of justice. There is neither possibility of compromise nor hope that the problem will miraculously vanish. It cannot be rationalized or ignored, and you cannot maneuver around it. It is a tangible, real, and self-generating interference in your life, and must be severely reformed before it causes any permanent damage to you.

In dealing with social and political affairs, a strict adherence to established justice is necessary. A society without principles or clarity about its laws is a group of people who are going nowhere. If you are a leader, then take the initiative to administer just, reasonable, and swift penalties to restore order; if you are a member, now is the time to support superior persons who can bring about social REFORM.

Personal relationships without defined guidelines, reasonable expectations, reciprocal considerations, and clear plans for the future are now in danger of dissolving in the chaos being generated by the current situation. Misunderstandings and confusions will become more common unless firm, clear headed action is taken to dispense with whatever you perceive to be an obstacle to union. There are times to avoid confrontations, to sublimate deep feelings, or to retreat and await a more opportune moment for action. This is not one of those times. Energetic REFORM will bring favorable results.

There could not be a more appropriate time to examine your character and determine the extent to which any delusions, rationalizations, or habits have usurped control of your judgment. Equivocal or vague principles, as a rule, will make of your life an undirected, uninspired, meaningless act. Know what you want, know what makes you feel good about your Self, know what brings you into harmony with others. These are your guidelines and principles. Other factors that assume control of your behavior or your health or that create inner discord are the obstacles that must be overcome. Be firm, unemotional, gentle, and clear in annihilating them and thereby re-forming your Self and your environment.

 

 

#  

# CHAPTER 22: **GRACE**

There exists now a perfect moment of balanced, aesthetic form. The multiplicity of your current experiences can be glimpsed as a still and shimmering tableau. This allpervasive elegance brings pleasure to the heart, clarity to the mind, and tranquillity to the soul. You are in a state of GRACE. Contemplating your environment with the extraordinary point of view offered at this exceptional time can give you a vision of the possible perfection in the world. Yet ambitious attempts to achieve such perfection would be a mistake, for this is idealism at its worst. Use this ephemeral moment of GRACE to contemplate and refine only your immediate surroundings. Do not make any major decisions now.

Your social world will unfold with luxurious ceremony and your awareness of your position will be enhanced by traditional social events. Keep in mind that now the emphasis is on form rather than content. Do not mistake one for the other. The perfect balance of GRACE and the fabulous insights it affords you will eventually pass. Such insights are only useful in adorning the present moment. They should not be used to determine and shape your future. There are inherent perils and pitfalls in the ideals of beauty and GRACE.

In worldly matters, continue in your long-standing principles and priorities. This state of GRACE can bring a new sophistication to the affairs of business or power, and the time may be used to enhance your position. Nevertheless, if there are significant or far-reaching decisions to be made, this is not the time to make them. Use this state of GRACE only to advance areas such as public relations and public image.

The heights of idealism are developing in your personal relationships. Your appreciation of the aesthetics in love can color your perceptions of all areas in your life. There is nothing wrong in this. Understand, however, that you are now perceiving the most idealistic aspects of love, where day-to-day concerns would bring certain disillusionment. Although a little emotional GRACE is a good thing in any relationship, it is neither the basis for marriage nor divorce.

GRACE is an enriching time in inner development and self-expression. Those involved in creative or artistic endeavors will find their work very satisfying. It is an inspiring time as ideas flow and the world seems to stand still. What is produced now appears to be divinely inspired. This moment of GRACE should be relished for the pleasure and good fortune it brings, but it should not become the pivotal experience for radical change. Instead, contemplate the perfection of the moment and lose your Self in the rare tranquillity of GRACE.

 

# CHAPTER 23: **DETERIORATION (SPLITTING APART)**

There is an impressive display of DETERIORATION in nearly every aspect of the current affair. These lesser elements, and those who represent them, have gained complete control over the situation. DETERIORATION will continue to spread until it falls out of fashion, and there is nothing a person of integrity can do but wait. Eventually there will come a change for the better.

In political affairs and matters of power the time may be thought of as a rapid DETERIORA TION or overthrow. There exists now an abundance of incompetent persons in positions of authority to help bring this about. As shown in the extraordinarily long period of recorded history in ancient China, where the I Ching was often used as a political manual, such declines were expected and accepted. The original text of the hexagram states: "The superior man respectfully appreciates the cycles of increase and decrease, of greatness and decadence, as revealed by the heavenly bodies." The text continues to warn against forging ahead at this time. Your best course is to wait out the difficult times and protect yourself by generously providing for those close to you.

The time should be contemplated with great care in all financial and business matters. If possible, do nothing to progress your own interests. You will simply be advancing into adversity and possibly disaster. The situation is in the hands of persons lacking in vision. Wait until things change and concern yourself, meanwhile, with insuring your own position. Reach out benevolently and consolidate your relationships with those below you. This will provide for you a secure foundation while you wait.

This is a difficult time socially, for fulfilling communications with others are in a state of DETERIORATION as well. In social interactions, a low profile will help you avoid misunderstandings. If you are an artist or involved in influencing your milieu, you could not pick a more unfortunate time to seek an audience. If you have the opportunity to overlook a social event, do so.

If there is a breach in your personal relationships, it cannot be easily bridged now. Remain calm and quiet for the present, and if you can, be generous and supportive of those dear to you. Then, when things improve, as they naturally will, you will find that you have preserved and strengthened your relationships.

At this time your health and inner development may be in a less than ideal state due to inferior elements in your environment. Yet external ploys will not put an end to the natural cycle of DETERIORATION. Time will. Nurture your mind and body reasonably and sensibly now. Look for wisdom in your acceptance of the times.

 

# CHAPTER 24: **RETURNING**

You are RETURNING to the beginning of yet another cycle in your life, after what may have seemed a long period of stagnation or frustration. Progress had been halted at every turn, and movement appeared impossible. Now the paths leading to renewed growth are revealing themselves. Although you may be quite anxious to proceed with your plans, you must keep in mind that things are just at their beginnings. Don't push. The improving situation will continue to develop at its own pace. This promising turn for the better is certain, and as natural as the change from a still, cold winter to the early anticipation of spring. And, like the seasons, the cycles in life cannot be hastened. Conserve your energies instead. You'll need them to cope with the inevitable complexities that arise with new phases. The RETURNING situation will establish itself of its own accord. Contemplate and adjust your relationship to this new phase in order to afford yourself a comfortable position within it.

This is a time when groups of like-minded individuals can come together and work toward a common goal. Success is indicated here because the progress of these individuals is unhampered, both in the external world and in their innermost motivations.

You may be experiencing a dormant period in your social life, or perhaps an illness that has held you back. This situation suggests a return to better times, but cautions as well against overly vigorous movement. Just because you feel better now, do not immediately throw yourself into an energetic undertaking or attempt to be the center of the social event of the season. Remember, you must strengthen the beginning with rest.

The time of RETURNING can also indicate a new beginning through a fresh approach to important relationships. If such is the case, treat this time very carefully. You must now be aware of what to expect from relationships that do not start out on the proper footing. Above all, this footing must be relevant to your nature. If you are still uncertain about this, this current phase is an ideal opportunity for selfknowledge. At the time of RETURNING to new beginnings is the implied end of an old cycle. Study the phase you are now exiting. It is a cycle. It had a beginning and you are experiencing its end. The reasons for certain things that may have been unacceptable or confusing to you are now apparent. The contemplation of the return

of these cycles can lead to profound inner knowledge. The Chinese refer to this hexagram as the apparent pattern of the intelligence of Heaven and Earth.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 25: **INNOCENCE**

The time demands an alignment with the flow of the cosmos. This adjustment must be made before further action is taken, otherwise you will begin to make mistakes. When actions that seem perfectly reasonable and cleverly planned are executed, they will end in difficulty and confusion. In order to harmonize your actions with the cosmos, it will be necessary to adopt an attitude of INNOCENCE. Examine your motives. They will be the cause of your problems. This is a time for acting without conscious purpose, without ulterior motive and with complete rectitude. Do not aspire to be rewarded for your actions, nor direct them cunningly toward personal advancement. Act innocently and react spontaneously.

Your instincts should be developed and modified in the direction of natural goodness. Your first inclinations should be to preserve your well-being, clear the way for your fellow man, and take note of worthwhile information. Without integrity and morality in your character you could not trust your instincts, for they might lead you into dangerous situations.

The path to your goal is now an indirect path. You must rely on your principles and inner virtue rather than clever strategies. This will not lead you away from success — on the contrary, INNOCENCE with spontaneity will bring creativity to many areas of your life. You will appear to your milieu inspired and brilliant. This will give you great influence. If you are a teacher, leader, or head of a family, use the insights and inspirations that will occur during a time of INNOCENCE to fulfill the needs of those who rely upon you. Do this without thought of compensation or hope  of a possible gain in stature.

It is important to keep in mind that laws of the cosmos are divine and do not necessarily follow the desires of man. Therefore, when acting in INNOCENCE, you will also experience the unexpected, the exceptional, the unpredictable. Be prepared for a surprising turn of events. What occurs will stimulate new ideas, even if at first this seems unnerving or full of complications.

A state of INNOCENCE could be a refreshing interlude in your personal relationships. Spontaneity can bring great pleasure as well as reveal true feelings and motives, whereas intrigue at this time would only yield perplexity and possibly disaster. Again, INNOCENCE may lead to surprising new areas of unexplored mutual interest.

For those who are puzzled or at a standstill in regard to a particular issue, a spontaneous method of action could lead to a highly creative and original solution. Act without guile and do not attack the problem directly.

 

# CHAPTER 26: **POTENTIAL ENERGY (THE TAMING POWER OF THE GREAT)**

Because you are in possession of a great deal of stored or POTENTIAL ENERGY, you may now undertake ambitious and far reaching endeavors. The timing of such efforts is of vast importance. The ability to control, direct, restrain, or store your powers will bring you very good fortune. Also, the continual re-evaluation of the correctness or worth of your plan is now a concern of major significance.

If you are considering issues that pertain to political matters, you should choose the path of public mindedness rather than personal advancement. Place your POTEN TIA L ENERGY at the disposal of a worthy leader. You can work toward the fulfillment of a cause or social ideology with assured success. The time lends itself to the attainment of great achievements. When in doubt, give thought to the historical doctrines upon which current political systems are based.

You will find that the affairs of business lean toward the interests of public service. Any endeavors that provide goods and services that directly benefit others will meet with great success. You have at your disposal the accumulated knowledge or resources to launch a significant commercial enterprise. Be certain, however, that your objectives are worthwhile in the overall scheme of things. This is too great a time to waste on frivolous ventures.

Bear with even difficult social relationships and attempt to cultivate useful connections. This time of POTENTIAL ENERGY can lend astonishing dimensions to your circle of influence. You can skillfully organize others into a useful network of social exchange. Artists and those involved in creative communications will benefit greatly by expanding their worlds. The emphasis now should be on pragmatic and useful communications.

You possess a storehouse of potential psychological energy. There is no reason that it should not be used in a positive exchange. Personal relationships could blossom overnight. For greatest success, hold to traditional values. View all feelings in the light of what has come before and what is expected by tradition.

Pay particular attention to the continuing development of your character. The totality of what you have experienced has organized itself into an illuminated perspective of great clarity. This may be a real breakthrough in the maturing process. You have the POTENTIAL ENERGY for an enlightened insight that could change your life.

 

 

# CHAPTER 27: **NOURISHING**

The idea of the hexagram NOURISHING originates from the interdependent structure of the food cycle on earth. All of life is sustained within a self-perpetuating system. An example of this system is the balanced exchange of oxygen, carbon dioxide, and nitrogen among plants, animals, and earth. At the same time, the quality and quantity of this NOURISHING exchange yields a particular quality and quantity of growth.

The correct NOURISHING of yourself and others is the focus of this time. When your endeavors involve the NOURISHING of others, it is important that they are worthy of such support. If you consistently nourish superior persons, who will in turn provide nourishment for others, you can achieve great effects. Through nurturing and support, social and political aims can meet with success.

In judging another person or situation, the model of NOURISHING is an excellent analytical device. Out of poor habits or erroneous thinking a man may nourish himself in an inferior way. This pattern may be detected by observing his outstanding character traits. If they are inferior traits, then he takes into himself inferior things and will have nothing to offer you. If his character traits are worthy of praise, that which he chooses to ingest is superior and he may have much that is worthwhile to give.

If there are difficulties in your relationship, take note of the quality of what you give to others. Do you offer inspiration or discouragement? Do you focus on what is wrong with particular situations or on what could be right? The correct NOURISHING of those close to you is vital to your sense of well-being, for such supportive activity will ultimately come back to you in kind. This cycle of NOURISHING will have an indirect yet profound impact on your life.

Additionally, you should exercise unrelenting discipline over your thought patterns. Cultivate only productive opinions and attitudes in order to properly nourish your character. If you are engaged in activity at this time, keep your mind as calm and relaxed as possible. Avoid excited and opinionated outbursts; instead, express yourself with moderation. Pay special attention to what you allow to enter your sphere of awareness, and, at the same time, avoid excessive indulgences.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 28:  **CRITICAL MASS (PREPONDERANCE OF THE GREAT)**

In an atom, when CRITICAL MASS is reached, it is a time when several heavy particles are occupying the same space, thereby creating extraordinary events and catastrophic chain reactions. In much the same way, the current situation is becoming weighted with a great many considerations. There are numerous decisions pending, the air is full of ideas with all their ensuing multifarious possibilities, and the ponderous affairs of the people around you are pushing into the foreground. All of it is important, serious, and meaningful, and all of it is coming to a head right now.

Your environment is rapidly becoming the meeting ground for many of the major circumstances affecting you. These things will take up a great deal of your time, space and energy. More and more of your attention will be demanded by these very real imperatives. There is a lot going on, the situation is excessive and may reach CRITICAL MASS soon.

Look for an avenue of escape. Prepare to make decisions about your next move. Carefully evaluate all of the things affecting you. You will need your wits about you to successfully make this transition. Have a goal or destination in mind.

In social or business affairs make a rapid assessment of your situation. Concern yourself with the care and development of your assets. These are the things that you will carry away with you, and they should become the foundations of your character. Be ready to make a quick transition into an entirely new mode of life.

When experiencing CRITICAL MASS in personal relationships and inner development you must realize that this may be a time of crisis. Naturally, all that is coming to a head cannot be put off, but you should marshal your forces and penetrate the meaning of what is happening. If necessary, retreat into your innermost Self and attempt to comprehend your position. When several significant things come upon you at once, you must be prepared to take a stand and rely on the resilience of your character to see you through. If it should happen that you must face this alone and, in fact, renounce your entire milieu, you should do so confidently and courageously. Times like these bring to light the true fiber of the Self. A person who is prepared for momentous times will survive them unscathed and emerge even stronger.

 Above all, when CRITICAL MASS is imminent, action must be taken. Tthis is a carefully considered escape or a resolute determination to dispense with what is to come, success surrounds those who remain strong and certain within. 

 

# CHAPTER 29: **DANGER**

The situation is one of real DANGER, caused by and manifested in the affairs of man. This DANGER is not inspired by overwhelming tendencies within the cosmos, or by conflicts in your innermost attitudes. The real DANGER that confronts you is brought about by your immediate environment. It will take skill to overcome the difficulties, but managed properly, this time of challenge can bring out the very best in you. The Chinese text points out that if you can act with confidence and virtue whatever you do results in success.

Do not avoid confrontations in any difficult or threatening situations; you must now meet and overcome them through correct behavior. Maintain a continued resolve. Hold to your ethics and principles and do not for a moment consider compromising what you believe to be right. Acting with integrity and confidence is the key to surmounting the DANGER.

In business or political affairs, stick to approved policy. When making judgments regarding matters of leadership, neither bargain with your principles nor attempt to avoid the issue, for such actions would render meaningless all that has been achieved thus far. In social interactions, remain true to your nature. If possible, convince others of the soundness of your ideas by demonstrating the good effects of your actions. If they will not support you, you do not need them. Keep moving. Do not dally in the DANGER. In personal relationships, do not allow passions to lead you into peril. If the difficulties cannot be resolved without sacrificing your principles, the relationship may be irresolute.

The time of DANGER can be especially good for inner development. By holding to fixed and virtuous ethics, by maintaining your inner vision and ideals, all things will fall into a steady, tangible perspective. You will know your relationships to your environment, and in this way you can accomplish your aims. Although subjective, this perspective is now in accord with the problems facing you.

Additionally, by persevering in high-minded conduct, you become a living example to your family and your fellow man. Through the consistency of your actions you guide and inspire others in the handling of their own affairs. This in turn will create order and dispel DANGER within your milieu. Thus you are protected.

Frequent encounters with DANGER are a part of life. Beyond making you inwardly strong, familiarity with DANGER, like the near brush of death, can instill in you a profound awareness of the life force and the mysterious nature of the cosmos. Such heightened awareness can bring new meaning, determination, and richness into your life.

 

# CHAPTER 30: **SYNERGY (THE CLINGING)**

When two elements approach each other in such a way that the scope of what they can achieve together far surpasses the total of what they could achieve separately, they atw• acting with SYNERGY. SYNERGY, in this case, takes the effectiveness of cooperation beyond normal expectations.

This hexagram suggests that you and the object of your inquiry are dependent upon each other. Working together, the interaction of your spheres of influence can achieve significant deeds. These synergetic interactions will provide ideas and inspirations, generate surplus energy for continued growth, and refine communications and perceptions.

In worldly affairs, this is a time when a leader, dependent upon his principles and his sense of correctness, can bring enlightenment and order to those whom he leads. Here the SYNERGY between a leader and his integrity yields benefits to the people. The Chinese point out here: "Clarity of mind brought about by dependence on what is right can transform the world and perfect it."

In personal relationships you will find that the alignment of your desires can now achieve a great deal. This is a good time to examine your relationships and note whether you are working against one another or with SYNERGY. Co-operative efforts will not take energy away from individual pursuits. In fact, working relationships should now be especially supportive of individual achievements.

Keep in mind that as an individual your relationship with the cosmos is conditioned. By nature, the earth is a place of limitations — limitations of energy, of ideas, of resources, and even of the life force itself. The best way to achieve your aims within the limitations of your situation is to depend upon and synergize your energies with the forces of the cosmos. Learn to recognize the times, and act accordingly. When pressures mount, don't become explosive. Instead, work quietly and diligently to alleviate them. At times of high energy, don't throw yourself away in undisciplined euphoria. Work toward making the best use of the energy to enact new ideas and further your goals. When energies subside, use the time to rest and gather your strength instead of exhausting yourself with useless struggling. The development of SYNERGY within the Self will give you added dimensions of control over your future.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 31: **ATTRACTION**

The universe as we know it is held together and governed by the various laws of ATTRACTION. From the vast movements of the solar system in infinite space to the perfectly balanced center of the atom, these mutual attractions create all things. In life. these attractions manifest themselves in a complex network of desire, perseverances and fulfillment. Life begets life and evolves itself in an ordered and divine fashion, The ATITRACTION between mates, with an underlying interest toward social unity and, perhaps. progeny, is the emphasis here. This magnetism is not a superficial desire. It is the beginning of the most basic social unit, the family, just as the atom. with the ATTRACTION of its positive and negative charges, is the basic material unit.

This is a serious and profound ATTRACTION that is shared by both you and the object of your interest, whether it is a person or a situation in which you are integrally involved in the outcome. In this situation you happen to be in the position of power. The initiative is yours. For the most successful results, you must subordinate yourself and free your mind of motive and prejudice. Allow the object of your interest to influence and change you. In this way, because of the advantage of your strength, ATTRACTION is reciprocal and the relationship or involvement is consummated.

This describes the way great leaders can influence society. An attitude of servitude demonstrated by the leader toward the people encourages them to approach him for advice and guidance. In this way the leader can direct others into areas of greater development and order.\* In social matters, your willingness to be influenced, even though you may be altogether self-sufficient, attracts others to you and creates an atmosphere for the exchange of ideas. Pertaining to personal relationships, it is unequivocally stated in the original text: "To take a spouse brings good fortune."

If you are attempting at this time to make a decision or judgment concerning another person, pay particular attention to what he attracts. In this way you can penetrate his nature and fate. By examining his energies, ideas and associations, you can begin to see what the nature of your involvement will be. Then you may determine if such an ATTRACTION will benefit you. The same holds true in the judgment of any situation. By penetrating that which the situation attracts — people, problems, and possibilities — you can see the way it will affect your current position, well-being, and future.

 

	 

# 

# CHAPTER 32: **CONTINUING (ENDURING)**

Consider flowering plant: its new leaves stretching open, reaching for the life-giving sun: its roots anchoring deep into the earth, drawing sustenance into itself. As if prompted by an invisible imperative, it forms its blossom and develops its fruit. In time its flower magically unfolds, inviting response to its sensual delights of color and scent. Nature. in turn, participates in pollinating and thereby furthering the development of the wondrous seed hidden within the fruit. Soon, after this co-operative celebration of life, the plant concentrates the total of its energies into the ripening fruit and maturing seed. In the end, as the plant declines and rests, perhaps terminating itself, the seed detaches and falls to the earth, CONTINUING the perpetuating mystery of existence. The Chinese say of this hexagram: "When we examine the continuance of things, the natural tendencies of heaven and earth can be seen. Herein lies the secret of eternity."

The time requires a regard for continuing traditions and enduring values. Look within for character traits that are self-perpetuating and self-renewing. New goals can be reached through relying on that which has endurance and consistency in your nature. Act out the laws of your inner Self, trust the inherent correctness of your instincts as you go about your business. In this way you will meet with success.

Social customs will offer assurances and support because of their very endurance. CONTINUING in traditions that are the understood bases of social interaction will now bring order, unity, and a deep sense of security to you and your community. This does not mean a blind dogmatism to arbitrary social institutions, but rather an adherence to foundations that support the growth of sound and smooth-working systems in life.

In business and political affairs, pay particular attention to the support of policies that have proved themselves useful. This is not the time to change methods of operation for the sake of change. Instead, it is a time to make these methods work with new trends in thought. Success now comes through CONTINUING movement toward long-standing objectives — objectives that are harmonious with a wellordered life.

Personal relationships will now develop most comfortably within the structure of enduring social institutions such as marriage or family. The ceremonies and customs that spring from tradition will bring joy and security into your life. At the same time, your relationships should have direction and should grow and adapt to the times. CONTINUING traditions will create a superstructure for a flowering relationship, as a trellis for a vine. Never should they become rigid limitations.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 33: **RETREAT**

The brillance of the moon begins to diminish at the moment it reaches its fullness, while winter's coming becomes apparent even in the summer. This natural pattern of advance and decline is reflected now in human affairs. Just as life prepares its enduring retreat from the dark stillness of winter, you must prepare to RETREAT from a rising darkness that will work at cross purposes to your aims.

Like winter, this hostile and inferior force is in accordance with the patterns in the cosmos. To RETREAT at the proper moment is the best course of action. Choose this moment wisely. If you RETREAT too soon, you will not have time to properly prepare your return; if you wait too long, you may be trapped. Your RETREAT should be confident and powerful. You are not abandoning the situation, but, instead, making a wise and timely withdrawal. Until the time is right for a countermove, only small things may be accomplished successfully. Modest but firm arrangements should be made both to aid in your return and to prevent any adversaries from advancing in your absence.

It is of great importance that you do not confront or struggle with opposing forces and thereby become emotionally involved with what is, actually, a futile situation. Vengeance and hatred will cloud your judgment and prevent the necessary RETREAT. You cannot win the war right now, but you can stop the enemy's advance. This is done with a determined detachment: Cut off the lines of communication, become self-sufficient, withdraw intellectually and emotionally.

Difficulties and hostilities are on the rise in matters of business or politics. Do not attempt to compete with these forces. Instead, concern yourself with small internal reinforcements. The overall situation is inflexible at this time, yet a detached RETREA T will give you the opportunity for later advancement.

•In your relationships, you may have to RETREA T en masse from the forces around you. If discord exists between you and your loved one, it is best to look upon it as a phase in the development of the relationship. Try to become composed and dispassionate. Your ideals cannot be met within the relationship at this time. Instead, RETRE4T and look inward for satisfaction.

You may now be suffering from an inner conflict based upon the misalignment of your ideals and reality. If such is the case, it is time to RETREAT and take a longer look. Do not abandon your principles, but do withdraw from situations and attitudes that create conflict. Continuing in inner conflict will result in stress that is unhealthy for both mind and body.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 34: **GREAT POWER**

GREAT POWER. when it befalls a man, is a true test of his character. All of his actions have significant influence upon others. What he says is heard, what he thinks is felt. He has the wherewithal to bring enlightenment and progress to his world or to lead it into chaos and evil. He can greatly further his inner development, or completely exhaust himself. Therefore the man possessing GREAT POWER is mostly concerned with correctness.

Keep in mind that power is a means and not an end in itself, In applying the available forces to the situation at hand, be certain that your timing is exact and that your actions are correct — that is, in the best interest for all concerned. The Chinese point out that actions that combine both correctness and GREAT POWER represent the true character and tendencies in heaven and on earth. The responsibility of correctness in times of GREAT POWER is unparalleled in importance, for actions that are inappropriate or incorrect will pull you and others into chaos.

There is little question that this hexagram is unusually auspicious in worldly matters. Although blessed with GREAT POWER, you would be wise to pause and be certain that your proposed objectives are honorable. Take a cue from the past. Do not do anything that is not part of established policy. Unorthodox actions can lead to downfall during powerful times. Be patient, too, and wait for the opportune moment before executing your plan.

Above all, the influence of GRE4T POWER will be most evident in direct social situations. You will find yourself in the center of attention. Your influence is tremendous at this time; your presence does not go unnoticed. Use the power to improve relations and implement good works. When in doubt, adhere strictly to established customs and social order. In this way you will realize continued support, even after the time of GREAT POWER is past.

You will find that you have unusual influence and power in personal relationships. This is, definitely, a responsibility. Those you love trust you and look to you  for leadership. Sensing their dependence, they may look to you for reassurance as well. Maintain now a strictly traditional role. Even innocent deviations from the traditional could end in emotional disaster.

Transcend difficulties in your inner development by remaining mindful of your shortcomings. Do not assume that your power indicates strength of character, or that it justifies all your attitudes and opinions. This is just another test. Pay special attention to timing, propriety and goodness in order to fully employ the GRE4T POWER available to you. In bringing enlightenment and progress to others, you strengthen your own sense of health and well-being.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 35: **PROGRESS**

This  is a time of rapid progress, which begins in a particularly radiant and enlightened Individual and benefits his entire society. He is, in turn, recognized and given a prominent position of continuing influence. He is thought of as an asset by both those in authority and those whom he leads.

Good ideas are now best put to use in serving others. If you are a leader and in a position to implement progressive action, you will meet with great success. You are in the midst of quickly expanding social and political interests. The influence you can now gain over others will propel you into a position of exceptional prominence. If you can maintain a virtuous and high-minded sense of social PROGRESS, you will be supported by your milieu, and your example will be emulated. If you are acting out of loyalty, you may now approach those in authority with confidence. Your intelligence and virtue will be quickly recognized, and you will be rewarded with advancement. Suggestions you might now make concerning the accomplishment of significant tasks will have great impact.

Communication is now of vast importance during a time of rapid PROGRESS. It is wise for you to stay in close touch with all levels of your social world. Monitor the needs of others and be supportive of progressive improvements. Take an active part in the affairs of society now in order to refine and enhance your inner worth.

In personal and family relationships, there is present a great opportunity for communication and mutual accord. The most rewarding aspects of family life can be seen when the members loyally support the goals of the individual and the individual's achievements bring honor and PROGRESS to the family. There is no room for jealousy here, and it is, indeed, inappropriate. You and your loved ones can now present a unified force socially, bringing position and power into the relationship.

By fostering altruistic motivations you make yourself radiant and influential. By developing sincere loyalties you make yourself strong in character. You can now bring even greater PROGRESS to your inner development by examining your relationship with your fellow man. Take note of your effect upon those in authority and 'your relations with your equals. If you can see a way to bring PROGRESS to them both, then you are on your way to an enlightened destiny.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 36: **CENSORSHIP (DARKENING OF THE LIGHT)**

You are directly confronted by forces that threaten both your convictions and the attainment of your goals. Unfortunately, your position in this situation is not powerful. It will be necessary to submit to this time of personal CENSORSHIP and step into the background. You must conceal your feelings. Make it a point to appear externally accepting of a difficult environment. It is both useless and dangerous to expound your convictions, and by doing so, you will only invite further difficulties. However, do not lose sight of your principles for even a single moment. You know what your goals are. It is tremendously important to maintain a fierce inner awareness of them during times when they seem almost unattainable. With this attitude you can strengthen your character and thereby put yourself in a position to transcend this formidable time.

If you find it necessary, you can influence others by approaching them on a disguised level. Be very reserved. If your awareness is hidden you will not pose a threat to your adversaries. In this way you can maintain your principles, influence others in subtle ways, and stay out of trouble. The Chinese say of this hexagram: "The superior man uses his intelligence by concealing it."

It is a poor time to challenge the opinions of others in social interactions. Let things pass even though they are contrary to your beliefs or aims. You will find that those around you are not sympathetic to your vision. Hide your feelings but still maintain your inner convictions. It would be wise to react as though you were in agreement with your adversaries and yet do nothing to actively help them. Generally, keep a low profile and postpone any political aspirations.\*

This is not a good time to openly examine the points of contention in your personal relationships. Your feelings and ideas are not popular issues with those close to you. At the moment there is nothing to discuss.

However, in areas of personal and spiritual development, this situation can help you learn to accept times of evil. If one attempts to aggressively deny or ignore evil, then evil is often nurtured in one form or another. Good and evil are as much a part of the cosmos as night and day. It is much easier to develop a sound character once evil is acknowledged and accepted as a part of the world.

 

# CHAPTER 37: **FAMILY**

In established families, the members adhere to their natural and comfortable roles. Their relations are based upon affection and upon a true sense of responsibility wherein the well-being of the FAMILY becomes as important as the pursuits of any one individual, The Chinese felt quite strongly about the value of this smallest of social units. They say of this hexagram: "Bring the family to its proper order and all social relationships will be correctly established."

When the roles between leaders and followers are understood and respected, then political situations become progressive. Leaders, like heads of families, must have inner strength and authority. They should be careful in their words and base their continuing credibility upon actions that demonstrate the soundness of their principles. Followers who defer to their leaders at this time can accomplish a great deal.

Business relationships should now be approached like FAMILY relationships. Such virtues as faithfulness, loyalty, and obedience can bring progress at any time, but never more so than now. Actions will speak louder than words, so don't waste time or money on rhetoric. Try to be consistent in your objectives and rely upon the guidance of authority to control the situation.

You can enrich your social relationships by adhering to roles based upon a natural affection and respect for others. Pretension, ostentation, and social climbing will work against you now. Your milieu demands enduring and consistent basic principles. You will be most successful if you fall back upon your true worth and conduct yourself with propriety. By persevering in established social customs you gain the support and loyalty of your society.

Rely upon your impulses and natural affections in personal relationships to suggest your true role. If you desire a traditional FAMILY relationship, then allow authority to be established and take your appropriate position. If there is a conflict of roles and your are not prepared to defer, then you may now run into severe problems. Your life will be significantly affected by the foundation provided in your FAMILY relationships.

Try to see all organizations, whether familial, social, or political, as FAMILY groups and then determine your most comfortable position within them. If you hold to this natural aspect of your character and understand the ensuing duties and responsibilities, you can more easily achieve your goals. Be certain, however, that you are not involved in carrying out a role for which you are unsuited, or a role that has been cast upon you. This will rob your life of meaning.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 38: **CONTRADICTION (OPPOSITION)**

There is a strong sense of CONTRADICTION at work in the current situation. It may be a matter of opposing viewpoints — persons who are working at cross purposes to one another or an inner duality that brings indecision. You must now gain an understanding of these divergent forces and better accord yourself with the times. Great achievements are out of the question, since they cannot come about without complete co-operation and alignment. only small endeavors and gradual influences will meet with good fortune.

In spite of the CONTRADICTION presented by opposing ideologies in political matters, there is a possibility for ultimate unity. In fact, the kind of unity that develops from contrasting forces is often more significant than allegiances that occur casually and without forethought. Therefore this existing polarity may very well create the ideal conditions for unanimity. Do not become impatient or reactionary. Instead, make gradual attempts to overcome political estrangement. A little diplomacy can now go a long way toward eventual order and co-operation.

Business or social strategies may appear ineffective, as they are neutralized by equal but opposing forces. Ambitious goals must wait for a more supportive atmosphere. Your best course of action now is to affirm friendly relations. Avoid being drawn into any questionable schemes. Do not make a grab for position. Use the existing polarity to emphasize the need for more co-operative conditions or for farsighted differentiations. This will help you organize well-ordered, working systems.

The CONTRADICTION that exists in family life and personal relationships is classic in form. The divergent wills of siblings, for instance, are in a state of opposition. Naturally, in the larger cycle these blood ties will become the basis for union, but for the present they are opposed. There now exists an atmosphere for misunderstandings or estrangement between men and women. Their inherent polarity is at its peak as they retreat into their own individual natures. Bridging the gap that is now present is a profound moment in relationships. It is the eternal dance of the sexes, the prerequisite for significant union. Such contradictions only highlight the pleasant possibilities of exchange. Use small, gentle influences now to bring about this mutual accord.

This is a time when you may meet with the dualism in your own nature. You may appear indecisive or equivocal to others as you weigh contradicting viewpoints. Never before have you been able to see both sides so clearly. Arbitrary predispositions such as patriotism, clannishness, fixed ideas of principle or class prejudice may become less important in your life as you begin to see things in the larger overview. The struggle between good and evil, life and death, and all such opposites may appear to be simply the natural interaction of the great forces in the universe, as you develop the perspective of the sage. This sense of oneness or wholeness in a world of CONTRADICTION can bring you great depth of character and peace of mind.

 

# CHAPTER 39: **NEW SCAN NECESSARY**

When flowing water, the image of the tao, meets with an obstacle in its path, a block age the suddenly in obstacle Such its journey, in is the the and way nature it eventually pauses. of the of rushing the It spilling increases obstacle water past facing in but volume it. are, you These in and now. fact, OBSTACLES strength, inherent It is a part filling in the of do up the chosen not in path front springpath.youof

have taken is nowhere and must worthwhile be overcome for you before to go. you Do can not continue. attempt Do to not push turn ahead and into run, thefor

there danger. If emulate you had the the example strength of to water: do so, Pause you would and build not have up your consulted strength the until oracle.the Instead, obstacle no longer represents a blockage. "It is advantageous To increase your to strength see the you great must man." rely Bringupon others. The original text states:

together those who can help you, seek advice from appropriate sources, get in touch with your divine nature. If you then follow through with persistence and correctness, you will meet with remarkable progress and success.

In all worldly paths, OBSTACLES appear naturally throughout the course of time. In matters of power and politics, obstructions must be overcome as they arise if you are to continue on your way. The correct approach requires a certain amount of cunning, for you must either organize a following or align yourself with established leadership in order to prepare an assault. In business concerns, now is an excellent time to hire those who can help you. Or perhaps you should consider joining forces with another. Look for qualities of leadership in these people, qualities that can surmount OBSTACLES standing in the way of long-term objectives.

A more conscientious approach to social matters is required now. The ability to be in the right place at the right time has never been more useful. If you have the opportunity to join with others who inspire you or can help you in your endeavors, do so. Also, turn your attention inward in social situations and note those OBSTACLES you create for yourself.

Many of your external OBSTACLES are, in fact, internally generated. Whether you create them in the process of acting out internal conflicts, or instinctively choose paths fraught with certain difficulties; they must nevertheless be overcome. These struggles will take place within the Self. Often referred to as inhibitions, such OBSTACLES will block your progress. Yet if you focus your awareness on them and persevere in constructive and positive thoughts, you will experience great good fortune as your developing character strengthens and prepares itself.

 

# CHAPTER 40: **LIBERATION (DELIVERANCE)**

Anxiety and strife will give way if you take firm, aggressive action now. Just as a thunderstorm releases tensions in the atmosphere, it is time to clear the air of mistakes and resentments. This should be done decisively and without hesitation in an attempt to return the situation to normal as soon as possible. The timely execution of a LIBERATION from difficulty is essential to success.

The solutions to annoying political problems are no longer elusive. It is within your power now to resolve issues that have blocked your progress. Deal with them expediently. When it is possible to overlook past errors and forgive transgressions, do so, for the sooner the tensions are relieved, the better for all concerned. If you should find yourself in the midst of an intolerable situation or intrigue, then perhaps the time has come to depart from the situation entirely. Whatever course you take, act quickly. Do not linger in the difficulties. A timely LIBERATION from the stresses that occur in matters of power will bring good fortune.

Persons and problems that have consistently stood in the way of business endeavors can now be bypassed. Many of your past difficulties should resolve themselves with ease, providing you with a profound sense of relief. Let them go and do not seek retribution. Your concern should lie in returning your affairs to their regular and intended pattern.

Your relations with others should become less rigid as tensions are relieved and a refreshing sense of LIBERATION replaces anxieties. You may now successfully resolve complications brought about by adverse social arrangements. This should be done without delay and with no show of emotionalism. There is no reason to dwell petulantly upon the past or glory in your newfound LIBERATION. Do what you must quickly and quietly, and carry on with your affairs.

Times of tension and anxiety are passing in your personal relationships as well. Take this opportunity to put the past behind you. This LIBERATION from emotional complications and adversity can give you a fresh new start with your loved one. You may, in fact, find the present time unusually erotic.

When LIBERATION is complete, when the tensions of the storm have passed, your spirit will be refreshed and stimulated. The ground will be cleared for new growth, and the future will appear promising. And, once you finally dispense with emotional ruts or resentments from former times, you will have an excellent opportunity for personal advancement. Overall, you should feel increased energy and clarity in your dealings with the outside world.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 41: **DECLINE** (DECREASE) 

The pendulum swings once again. this time moving into a general DECLINE.Although the DECLINE points to the beginning of a later flowering, the way you handle this current decrease in resources is of great importance. This decrease is in accordance with the forces in the cosmos and therefore perfectly natural and completely unavoidable. You will ultimately benefit, however, from any sacrifices you must make now.

Accept the DECLINE and respond appropriately by simplifying your life. A sincere and simplified approach to life will prevent you from making serious mistakes with reality and will improve your sense of timing. If you find the DECLINE unacceptable and continue the pretense of more oppulent times, you will fall into error and out of touch

Simplicity at this time is genuinely good for your inner development. You must now alter certain attitudes by curbing your instincts and passionate drives. Even in your innermost Self you must economize in accordance with the current DECLINE of the life force. If you normally function with a great deal of tension, it is time to modify your behavior. Become conscious of any extravagant emotional reactions. By sacrificing any indulgences that occur at the instinct level, you can now benefit the higher aspects of your nature.

This work on the Self underlies the considerations in all worldly affairs. The DECLINE becomes evident in diminishing social contact. Again, you should not try to force events or carry on as though nothing had changed. Instead, turn your energies within and apply them to your personal aims. Success is yours through sincere devotion and simplicity.

In business affairs, the time will manifest most sharply in terms of material loss: loss of goods or wealth. Yet success in these matters is presaged if your attitude is confident and accepting, and if you attend to the business at hand. Remember, the time of sacrifice is transitional in nature. The pendulum continues to swing.

Personal relationships may now bring less excitement and pleasure than they have in the past. There may be less meaningful communication between you and yours, and a frustrating lack of information. Don't become angry or provocative in an attempt to rekindle passions. Instead, gear the relationship down to a simpler form more appropriate to the time of DECLINE. Be as reassuring as possible to those dear to you while devoting your energies to the refinement of your character.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 42: **BENEFIT (INCREASE).**

Exceptional energy is being directed into the current situation. Many things will become possible, even very difficult undertakings. It is important to make the best use of your time now, as conditions will change. Pursue your goals on a daily basis and remain persevering. Keep in mind that your immediate goals should serve to BENEFIT your entire milieu in order to attain the successes implied in this hexagram. The kind of energy available can be utilized only on worthwhile endeavors.

If you are a leader, employer, administrator, or other figure of influence in the community, it is a very auspicious time to be generous toward your supporters. You may, in fact, be called upon to make a sacrifice from your personal resources to advance the goals of your followers. Such a gesture can now greatly BENEFIT society. People will be so moved by your actions that they will be irresistibly compelled to loyalty and unity, thus strengthening the commonwealth. The Chinese say of this hexagram: "To rule truly is to serve."

Those engaged in business or political affairs can use this model to BENEFIT their own aims, provided their goals are worthy. The time is ideal for offering especially generous services to others. This will open the way to greater areas of potential development. Generous actions, too, can enhance social, family, and personal relationships.

At this time it is possible that you are looking within, toward the development of your character. Because of the intensity of the benevolent forces surrounding you, you are presented with an excellent opportunity for self-improvement. Whether you would like to break old habits or foster new and useful disciplines, there now exists the proper alignment of forces for beneficial results. This is a particularly fortuitous time to discard a self-indulgent attitude or endeavor in order to gain a certain fundamental goodness, a sound foundation, a sense of direction and well-being. By discarding bad habits you will find you can accommodate improved and progressive patterns. Self-awareness and self-discipline are the keys to this transformation. Observe the beneficial effects of good in others and emulate these useful traits.

 

# 

# CHAPTER 43: **RESOLUTION** 

The forces that may threaten you are now in a position to be eradicated. This must be done without thought of retreat, wholly in the open, and without violence. You can\_ not engage your adversaries in battle for, in acknowledging their strengths, you engage them and give them power. Instead, you must deny their power by making a firm, public RESOLUTION to grow in the direction of what is good for your welfare.

No compromise is possible. RESOLUTION must spring from your heart and must be voiced to your friends, family, and community. Let others know fülly of your intentions to overcome obstacles. This should be done calmly, cheerfully, and with authority, thus giving you a psychological advantage such as a master of gamesmanship holds over his opponent. These struggles take place without passion, emotion, or violence but with inner truth and resolve that do not know defeat. The struggle should continue until there is nothing standing in the way of your progress.

Your relationship to society at large may require you to announce the truth openly. Open truth can lead to danger, but danger, as pointed out in hexagram No. 29, can be a very good thing for all concerned. This could refer to a legal proceeding or a pronouncement of your intentions to effect change. RESOLUTION calls for peaceful, nonviolent methods. Your attitude should be friendly but uncompromising. Remember, you are dealing with truth, and therefore all else must be discredited.

In personal relationships, you may now openly make a RESOLUTION to overcome difficulties by making progress in constructive directions. This will surely strengthen the bonds between you. When dealing with children, point out the possibilities rather than focusing on negative issues.

However, when taking a stand in righteousness be certain that you harbor no internal manifestations of the difficulties you've resolved to overcome. You cannot fight corruption with corrupt motives, injustice with self-serving interests, or lies with hidden deceptions. In the process 'of making a public RESOLUTION you must openly examine all aspects of your Self. If you are filled with self-satisfaction and pride, dispense with these attitudes in order to grow further. If you are miserly in accumulations and information, distribute them to others so that more will flow through your hands. One who is too full can develop no more and can only invite collapse.

 

# CHAPTER 44: **TEMPTATION** (COMING TO MEET) 

A seemingly harmless yet potentially dangerous TEMPTATION has entered the picture. How could such a minor element pose a threat to an ongoing situation? How can a nonessential entity seize control and create darkness and chaos in an established environment? You need only entertain and indulge this TEMPTATIONto find out. When you give your attention to darkness, you grant it a position of power in your life. This encounter cannot be avoided, but you can prevent it from gaining in influence.

Even in a normally relaxed social environment you should now guard against the fostering of inferior ideas or persons. Make your feelings known. This may manifest most often in political affairs, for it is here that temptations pose the greatest threat. Do not give power to the people who support these ideas, regardless of the circumstances. Confront issues that seem inferior and encounter publicly persons who represent deficient ideals. Your words will have impact now.

In business matters, what you propose to do or what has been proposed to you is counterproductive. Beyond wasting your time, it could prove to be dangerous. Whether it involves a quick turnover of money or a commitment to an unproved but attractive offer, it might well create more problems than profits. Let others know how you feel in encountering this TEMPTATION and you will set a strong business policy in your example.

Do not expect much at this time from personal relationships, especially from persons with whom you are newly acquainted. Unavoidable confrontations may now bring to light inferior elements. The original text specifically points out, "It will not be good to marry," and refers to a person of questionable principles who is exploiting the situation. Consequences are not obvious now and foresight is at a low ebb. Openly express your convictions and desires in your relationships and you will drive away disruptive temptations.

The Self may be encountering a wholly new indulgence, again seemingly harmless. This internal TEMPTATION is the most difficult kind to turn away. From such indulgences you may develop a prominent and demanding character trait or a disturbing inner conflict. Exercise self-discipline and hold to routine patterns and principles. Now, more than at any other time, inferior trifles can grow into great internal influences. Casual encounters with these weaknesses should be vigorously controlled to reinforce the proper development of your character.

 

 

# CHAPTER 45: **ASSEMBLING**

The ASSEMBLING of a group is the basis of this situation. The members of the group unite because of shared bonds or goals. This assemblage can be a reunion of people with a common heritage, such as a family or religious congregation, or an artificial structure such as society, business, or politics.

The major key to understanding and acting harmoniously with this time lies in the contemplation of the center. In every gathering there is a leader and/or common goal. Whether you are this leader or whether you are one of several striving for the attainment of a goal, your commitment to this assemblage is now of vast importance for both your own personal well-being and that of the group.

During the time of ASSEMBLING every member of the enclave must maintain unity and ensure that a sympathetic bond exists throughout. Disharmony among members and factions that form out of divergent goals will undermine the group. Strong bonds must be maintained and strengthened by adherence to appropriate moral principles, and by constant movement toward ever greater deeds.

In matters of business or group politics, you must be certain that the stated objectives strike you as honorable and that you trust your leaders. At this time you may approach those in authority with success. You must, however, have sincerity and commitment in your heart, as you may be called upon to make a sacrifice for the attainment of the general objective. If you make this sacrifice, it will bring good fortune.

Relationships may be emphasized at this time. You can now readily familiarize yourself with your position socially or within your family. Note the quality of your interactions. Self-observation within a group can speed you toward an expanded awareness. The original Chinese text points out that "by observing the way gatherings evolve, we can perceive the inner tendencies of heaven and earth and of all things."

Within the Self, too, there is a central force of character that unifies thoughts and actions. When you are not in accord with your goals, you may feel indecision, conflict, or malaise; when you are, a sense of confidence and well-being will surround you.

 

# CHAPTER 46: **ADVANCEMENT (PUSHING UPWARD)**

You will experience an ADVANCEMENT in personal power and esteem because of a timely accord of your modest, steady actions with the tendencies of the cosmos. The coming success is tremendous in scope since the foundation it rests upon has been developed with true devotion over a reasonable period of time, and since the time is fortuitous, indeed, for the goals " you have in mind. As it so appropriately states in the Bible about times like these, the lines are fallen unto me in pleasant places, yea, I have a goodly heritage."

Take full advantage of your good fortune by using this opportune time to approach those in authority. Do not be apprehensive or intimidated by this. Assertive and confident contact with those above you will meet with successful response. Furthermore, do not pause in the efforts you have made so far, for continuous activity is necessary to yield the most beneficial results in your ADVANCEMENT. Through the steady force of your will, your luck will remain excellent.

You may expect a promotion or ADVANCEMENT in political or business matters. Because of your past willingness to adapt your energies to the objective at hand, you will now gain benefits, perhaps beyond your expectations. Your superiors will be receptive to your desires, and you will achieve personal recognition.

Such recognition is indicated in social affairs as well. A gain in your social stature is coming, even though it may be unexpected. Join with others in community projects and see them through to completion. You will now instinctively choose endeavors that are harmonious with the rhythms and desires of society, and as a result you will be favorably regarded.

Rather than overshadowing or threatening your personal relationships, your ADVANCEMENT in influence will create a thriving emotional environment. You can now make a genuine breakthrough in communication with those dear to you. If you pursue this actively you will develop even stronger bonds.

All work on the Self is now centered in the will. Know what must be done and carry it out with unwavering effort. Through self-discipline, the foundation of a strong will can now be successfully formed. This will bring both immediate good fortune and long-lasting strength of character.

 

 

# CHAPTER 47: **ADVERSITY**

All physical events are natural events, subject to the laws of advancement and ADVERSITY. Human situations, too, follow the same physical laws. To imagine that which is man-made to be unnatural is a misunderstanding. Such misconceptions are what separate the individual from his tao. It is of vast importance now to maintain this connection.

ADVANCEMENT, hexagram No. 46, has progressed into ADVERSITY. This time of difficulty is a natural turn of events. It will present real problems, but they can be endured with the proper attitude. They may even lead exceptional persons into success. When faced with adversity, remain emotionally stable and optimistic. Hold your fears in check. If you indulge in insecurities, you will succumb to the overwhelming urge of the times and lose yourself in losing. The current ADVERSITY has been brought about by fate. The Chinese offer a single formula for overcoming such events: "The superior man stakes his life on following his will." Here ADVERSITY leads to inner strengthening, bringing success.

In all worldly matters, it will take extraordinary will to succeed. Your major difficulty at this time is that your words will not influence others. There is a possibility, in fact, that what you have to say will not be believed. To avoid enmity and confusion, rely instead upon actions. In social situations be sparing of words. Let your deeds speak for you. Your strength of character and determination will appear through your veil of silence. Thus the truth will become evident.

When making evaluations in business and political matters, keep in mind that this time has been compared by the Chinese to a forest tree growing in a tight space, unable to spread its branches. Only through sheer will and determination can this restraining ADVERSITY be transcended. As the tree stakes its life upon its upward reach for light, so must the superior man rely upon his will. Do not let backward trends or oppression jar your confidence and optimism. Continue in your pursuits.

Relationships may suffer from the exhausting strain of ADVERSITY. When two people are involved in an adverse and oppressing situation, both must be committed to the ongoing relationship in order to emerge successfully from the difficulty. Again, words have no weight here and often lead more to confusion than clarity.

Both your inner development and physical health can benefit from ADVERSITY if you can hold fast to your vision. Remember, if your spirit is broken, all is lost, so cast away negative or pessimistic thoughts. Since external influence is denied you, your inner development is very much the focus and major necessity of this time. The will is tempered and made strong as you struggle to overcome opposition and difficulty.

 

 

# CHAPTER 48: **THE SOURCE (THE WELL)**

This hexagram represents the deep, inexhaustible, divinely centered source of nour\_ ishment and meaning for humanity. Although people may journey from spiritual discipline to political discipline, explore various philosophies and scholarly pursuits alter their awareness in myriad ways — they must always return to THE SOURCE of their true nature for fulfillment. The original Chinese text depicts this hexagram as The Well. It states: "The town may be changed, but the well cannot be changed. It cannot be increased or decreased." THE SOURCE contains and is born of the collective truth of humanity. It receives from the individual's experience and gives to the individual's nature. Penetrating THE SOURCE of humanity can be seen as the major theme in Chinese philosophy. Confucius, China's great philosopher, said, "If you set your mind on humanity, you will be free from evil." The text of the hexagram points out that if The Well is not penetrated fully, there will be misfortune.

THE SOURCE particularly refers to and governs the social and political systems of mankind. These organizations must be centered and planned around the predispositions of human nature. Such organic ordering then rings true in the hearts and minds of the people, as their needs and prejudices are met. It requires an exceptional personality to organize others in this way. If you are such a leader, be certain that you penetrate the true feelings of your fellow man. Without this forethought and sense of humanity in a leader, good government is impossible, and misfortune results. Social disorder and evil reign because the leader is not the right man to execute the "plan." The right man can be recognized by his ability to inspire those whom he leads. He encourages them in their individual pursuits and promotes co-operation.

In social matters, try to develop your intuition about the nature of your fellow man. If you attempt to judge others without penetrating to THE SOURCE of their human instincts, your observations will be shallow and lacking in perspective. Be careful, however, not to get lost in overgeneralizations or dogmatic thinking. There are countless variations on the human theme.

In your personal relationships, try to discern the biological and sociological  promptings that bring you together rather than shortening your focus to the issue at hand. There are universal truths that bring certain individuals together. Uncovering THE SOURCE of these truths and perceiving their eternal nature will give you enlightenment, whereas a myopic viewpoint, at this time, brings misfortune.

 

 

# CHAPTER 49: **CHANGING (REVOLUTION)**

At work in the situation are in conflict, leaving the path open to change. of bringing about such a change is as difficult as it is important. People feat ch•nß because of its unknowable effect upon the future; so when a real need for (HA makes itself felt, it is a serious matter indeed. Clarity, forethought, and great devotion are now required to achieve your purpose. If correctly handled, how the results can lead to a progressive new era.

In order to avoid stagnation and degeneration in the current situation, a transforming change may be necessary. First, determine that this is actually the case. Study the mood of the times. Speak to others and weigh their reactions. Apprehend the needs of your milieu and make certain that this is not a passing mood, an Indulgent fantasy, or inspired by selfish motivations. CHANGING should not be undertaken unless it is absolutely necessary. A necessary change will bring enlightenment to people and give them a working perspective into their futures.

Second, be certain to approach CHANGING with a correct and regulated attitude. The change should be gradual, improvement by improvement, so you may gauge the effect. Avoid haste and excessive behavior. This is not a violent revolution, it is a carefully calculated transformation. Keep an eye at all times to the bearing of the cosmic forces and be certain the proposed change is consonant with the times. It will require great perseverance to carry out this vital change, and therefore its correctness will be the major factor leading both to success and your own continuing credibility.

Finally, your timing in this matter is crucial. Because the results of a CHANGING situation are not evident until the change has already occurred, it is very difficult to demonstrate the reason for change. In order to gain support from others, you must carefully time your efforts. Remove discordant elements as they appear, throw out outmoded or stifling policies when they once again create problems, and establish far-reaching clarity about the future whenever the opportunity presents itself. As the constructive aspects of your activities come to light, you will gain the trust of others. Your self-image will improve, and your influence will spread.

Your personal relationships may require CHANGING now as well. There is some possibility here of conflicting interests or perhaps aggressive attempts to control the relationship. This occurs beca-use of a need for a single, well-ordered vision. If things get completely out of hand; give thought to altering the entire nature of the relationship. You may be in the midst of a revolutionary change in your overall point of view. It will take time and effort to bring all the external elements of your life into accord with this new outlook, but success is definitely assured.

 

# CHAPTER 50: **COSMIC ORDER (THE CAULDRON)**

The relationship between the development of the individual and the needs of the cosmos demonstrates the meaning of COSMIC ORDER. When the two are in harmony. COSMIC ORDER exists, human potential is enhanced, and many things flourish. Such harmony can be illustrated by the beneficial relationships between a man and his superior or society and its leaders. Scholars consider this hexagram a strong indicator of harmonious accord with the cosmos.'

At this time, the decisions of leaders and politicians are wise and well regarded. In business affairs, prosperity is suggested because you satisfy the demands of your market. In general, those ideas that you currently hold most valuable are indeed worthwhile. Whatever sacrifices you must make to attain your ideals will be rewarded, and your success will confirm the worthiness of your venture, thus reinforcing your confidence. If you are an artist, your art will stimulate and inspire your audience.

Personal and familial relationships can develop into new areas of social achievement. Together you can accomplish great deeds. The powerful influence of your mutual harmony will impress your community. At the same time, you will be strengthening the bonds of your relationships.

This is a time for readjusting your individual relationship with the cosmos. There are certain areas in the life and nature of the individual that are fated, just as there are limitations in the forces of nature on earth. This is not an easy concept for Western man to accept, but an acceptance of fate can lead to great personal power. In your own life, this acceptance can bring you success in worldly matters. You will begin to perceive what is actually possible for you to achieve and not waste precious energies on the impossible, those things that are not in accord with the COSMIC ORDER given the circumstances of your life.

If you can harmonize your aims and desires to the needs and flow of the cosmos, significant deeds will become possible. Perhaps the contemplation of the dynamism behind the oriental martial arts will further demonstrate this principle: In the martial arts, you use the strength and force of your opponent's attack to overpower and defeat him. In worldly affairs you can plan your strategies for the attainment of ambitious goals by acting in harmony with the energy and bearing of the cosmos. Here the use of The Book of Change can be of great value by revealing your position in the general scheme of things.

 

 

# CHAPTER 51: **SHOCKING**

The sudden force of stored and kinetic energy in the cosmos will be released in a powerful and SHOCKING display. Like the awesome clap of a thunderbolt that explodes in the hushed moments before a storm, it will instill in the hearts of all who hear it an intense reverence and awareness of the overwhelming power of nature. All things in the cosmos will be aroused to movement through fear. This movement will be cautious, and cautious movement will bring success.

The time is like spring, when new growth is aroused by the forces of nature. In human affairs it can manifest as a SHOCKING turn of events, an unpredictable, cataclysmic occurrence inspired by invisible but irresistible forces. If your first reaction to this is fear and reverence, then good fortune will follow. A heightened experience of the forces that affect your life will bring you into close contact with the inner workings of your nature. You can examine your reactions and thereby determine how best to strengthen your character.

Once the SHOCKING event has passed, like the thunderbolt before the storm, the taut readiness of your awareness and caution will be released in joy. Surviving this terrifying force will give you confidence in your ability to deal with all that follows. If you can learn to react with virtuous accord and maintain your composure, success is truly yours. This composure and inner strength are the marks of true leaders, persons who can greatly benefit society. During times of shock you will have the opportunity to make new gains in social influence by handling yourself with tranquillity and poise.

This is a good time to examine your relationship to all of your external affairs. Carry on with whatever you are engaged in but be certain that you have most of the elements of your life under control. Affairs that are pending and unfinished business will cause difficulties during SHOCKING times. Yet if these times inspire you to make innovative changes in your life, in your relationships and in your Self, you will meet with vitality and success.

 

# CHAPTER 52: **MEDITATION (KEEPING STILL)** 

There is a focus now upon your inner perspective. It is of particular importance this time that you meditate upon the object of your inquiry. With this frame of mindat you can realign yourself to the tao.

MEDITA TION here refers to a state where your thoughts do not go beyond the situation at hand. It is not a single act but a frame of mind.\* Once the mind is calm and the ego quelled. you will transcend your internal turmoil. Your inner stillness will bring enlightenment by objectifying your impressions. You can now make exceptional by acting in accordance with the cosmos. MEDITATION and inner calm will help to center you. Through objectivity, you will know when to act and when not to act. In this way you make no mistakes and suffer no consequences.

Because of the external complexities in worldly matters, it is of great importanceto rather achieve than an reacting inner peace with which impulsiveness. will allow Hold you to your act thoughts in harmony to the with present the times,and attempt an unprejudiced view of the situation. Actions that spring from this attitude will be appropriate and well regarded.

Relationships can now benefit from internal stillness. By avoiding thoughts that project too far into the future, and dispelling illusions of what can or will be, you can overcome ego-generated difficulties. MEDITATION, as well, can prevent you from making regretful social errors.

MEDITATION, in general, can renew both mind and body. By pacifying stress that is based upon projection and fantasy, true relaxation can be attained. The instincts that spring forth will be in accordance with your real needs. Stop your thoughts now\*

 

ZhuangZi: Do not be the possessor of fame. Do not be the storehouse of schemes. Do not take over the function of things. Do not be the master of knowledge. Personally realize the infinite to the highest degree and travel in the realm of which there is no sign. Exercise fully what you have received from Nature without any subjective viewpoint. In one word, be absolutely vacuous. The mind bf the perfect man is like a mirror. It does not lean forward or backward in its response to things. It responds to things but conceals nothing of Its own. Therefore it is able to deal with things without injury to its reality.

 

# CHAPTER 53: **DEVELOPING**

The time points to a careful and natural unfolding of events. Rapid revolutionary growth is inappropriate now, and instead, a deliberate and slow cultivation of the situation is the path to success and good fortune. Only by gradually DEVELOPING your relationship with the area of your concern can you make the kind of progress you desire. Calmness and adaptability along with good-natured persistence will gee you through.

Although the process seems slow and at times unchallenging, the affairs of power and politics require gradual measures. A step-by-step process in DEVELOpING your position is the key to success now. In forming unions or affiliations, move slowly. Do not attempt to use agitating devices in order to gain a following. This is the time for elections rather than revolutions, for promotions and not usurpations. Leaders who hold to righteousness in their duties can now gain a prominent position. In this way an ordered and productive enviroment is created.

Your social world now offers little in the way of the avant-garde. Established social customs and traditional values are the keys to arousing the sentiments of others. Grand attempts to achieve a striking effect would be unwise and have little lasting value. Your time will be best spent DEVELOPING a position of meaningful influence through socially acceptable and co-operative efforts. In all interactions, allow things to develop naturally.

This slow DEVELOPING of affairs is important to keep in mind in business matters. This is not a time of quick profits or rapid advancements. Yet success does come if you hold a firm inner vision of your plans while adapting to established business policy.

When attempting to sort through the many potentials, possibilities, and problems that arise in your more personal relationships, you can find comfortable guidelines in observing established social mores. The time amplifies the idea of the traditional and the gradual. A slowly DEVELOPING engagement that leads to marriage was the example used in the original Chinese text of this hexagram. Refrain from hasty or passionate action and lean toward the romantic cultivation of love.

Even though you may desire to make great changes in your life, your path lies in the traditional DEVELOPING of events. Make an attempt to see yourself against the backdrop of enduring social values. Once you understand yourself and your duties in this larger context, you can make meaningful progress. The inner calm and sense of duty and morality that come with this perspective lend weight to the character and set a good example for others.

 

 

# CHAPTER 54: **SUBORDINATE (THE MARRYING MAIDEN)**

The balance of forces at work at this time are wholly inequitable, You reasons of circumstance, be assertive or while make the yourself situation are completelyindispen-can get

dependent upon a situation for along quite well without you. If you try to sable, you will meet with misfortune. It has never been easier for you to make mistakes. since everything you do is inappropriate. You are not in control of a single thing, with the exception of your ability to perceive your difficulties and react accordingly. It would be in your best interests, now, to behave as a SUBORDINATE. with propriety, passivity, and constant caution.

Your individuality is totally eclipsed by social considerations. If you are heard, no one pays attention. If you assert yourself, you are thought bold and presumptuous. No one is interested in your views. At best, what social contact you have is circumstantial; at worst, you are being used. Regardless, you can influence no one without being misunderstood.

If you are beginning a new job, watch carefully for early mistakes and correct them quickly and quietly. Act as a SUBORDINA TEand you can avoid error. Do not attempt to be creative or to excel in your work or to supplant a superior. Any attempts to get ahead will end in disaster. Do only what you were hired to do; do it well and nothing more. In political matters and questions of power, it is better, now, to withdraw into the background than to give evidence of your impotence. Use your energies instead to strengthen your inner vision.

In the original Chinese text, this hexagram was called the Marrying Maiden and referred metaphorically to the difficulties of a nonprivileged concubine who remained SUBORDINATE to the recognized marriage. In your personal relationships you are not being perceived as who you truly are. You are thought of in terms of your role and how you manage to fulfill it. Your subordination to this role is an unrewarding moment in your emotional life, but it will pass. Don't force this issue with your mate, for the ensuing recriminations may be disastrous. Remain passive for now and hold to the enduring aspects of the relationship to see you through.

  The time when you are forced to subordinate yourself is best spent in thought of the future. Develop and cling to a long-range ideal. This will take you beyond this difficult time, with few mistakes and increasing clarity of purpose.

 

 

# CHAPTER 55: **ZENITH (ABUNDANCE)**

The ZENITH describes the furthest expansion of greatness as in the moment of the full moon. the longest day of the year, or the heights of personal esteem. The time is one of peak abundance. Potentials are fulfilled, true goals are realized, possiblities are exhausted. Yet the ZENITH is usually brief. The longest day of the year lasts only one day. Tomorrow marks the beginning of decline, of contraction.

You should feel a sense of satisfaction in your dealings with the outside world. When decline approaches, the superior man does not anxiously anticipate it, for he expects such cyclic changes. He is, instead, concerned with making the best of matters at hand. With such an attitude one can easily continue as a leader. Do not waste any energy on preserving the ZENITH of your greatness. Do not even think about it. Your current accomplishments, your sense of justice, your present image, all that you are now creating, will sustain you through the decline.

Success and prosperity are imminent in business matters as potentials are fulfilled and objectives reach their ZENITH. Utilize your successes as foundations for later growth. If you feel that it's necessary, the coming decrease can be held off temporarily by expanding your objectives. By involving more personnel or resources and establishing greater goals, you can push ahead the ZENITH of your potential. You will, however, reach it again, since it is a natural cycle in life.

If you are investing time socially, you should find it rather rewarding as your personal esteem is in its greatest moment. You can now allow your judgments to totally determine your actions. This strict adherence to your principles will create an image that will continue to live on once your personal powers begin to ebb. In your more intimate relationships, make spontaneous affection your major concern. If you have developed together a clear understanding of what is expected from the relationship, the details will take care of themselves. Then the inevitable ups and downs will be overshadowed by endurance of love.

Your motivations may begin to take on completely new directions just at the moment when you feel the greatest self-possession. Learning to understand this natural tendency in inner development is a true gift in understanding yourself and others. The ZENITH of inner awareness is a fascinating time for self-discovery. Move quickly, however, because it will not last long.

 

# CHAPTER 56: **TRAVELING**

The planet is covered with communities, each with histories, traditions, CUstoms freedoms, and limitations. They are communities of towns and cities, communities of careers and special interests, religious and philosophical communities, or corn. munities of racial or familial ties. They that bond all run them very intricately deeply through within themselves. time and space,The

and all share common experiences person who is TRAVELING, the tourist of life, will touch them all but remain rooted in none. The time of TRAVELING is primarily a state of mind, yet it leads the traveler into very real spaces. Proper attitudes are of vast importance when moving through both time and space.

You are TRAVELING through the situation at hand. It is unlikely that you will put down roots or fashion your life around it. You are tasting, testing, sightseeing, and collecting information. Whatever the reason for the visit, you will move on. Because of this, long-range and significant aims cannot be accomplished. The traveler should hold to modest goals and behave with good grace and propriety. People on the move are moving targets, therefore caution and reserve should be exercised in your dealings with those you meet on the way.

In no other situation must your principles be so clearly defined and functioning than during the time of TRAVELING. Avoid areas of decadence and follow paths that you know are good. In this way you can steer clear of problems that you may not even recognize as such. There are fewer traditions, seniorities, positions, and rights between you and instant retribution. Therefore be helpful and humble and generally inconspicuous. Then you may experience fascinating insights without the dangerous pitfalls.

In social and personal relationships you cannot and should not make long-term commitments at this time. Be honest about your position and obliging toward the needs of others. Keep passions to a minimum. This is not the best time to eagerly express your opinions or impose your way of doing things. You should instead listen and learn.

This could be a phase in your life when you are making an inner voyage, exploring new ideas, fantasizing new experiences, perhaps a new career or role. It may be that you see mundane day-to-day situations in a strange new light. If this is not a passing mood, it could mark the beginning of an identity crisis. Whatever is up, hold to your integrity — it may become your lighthouse in the sea of the unknown.

 

# CHAPTER 57: **PENETRATING INFLUENCE (THE GENTLE)**

Chinese art often depicts the effects of the invisible wind as it influences the landscape. Mountains are shown eroded and sculpted into fascinating forms, trees bend and twist into exotic shapes, clouds roll dramatically across the sky, bringing life-giving rain. In contemplating the wind, the Chinese mind is inspired by the profound effect of a steady, PENETRATING INFLUENCE, and how this effect might manifest itself in human affairs.

You are faced with a situation that can be influenced only by gradual efforts in a consistent direction. Gentleness is the key here. Violence and radical movement would only alarm and repel. To influence effectively, you must maintain clearly defined goals over a long period of time. Your efforts should be as inconspicuous as possible. Try to imagine and emulate the gentle, unceasing wind. Success will come in a gradual way, bringing increasing clarity of purpose.

To influence a group, you must thoroughly comprehend the spirit of the community. If the group has a strong leader, hero, or ideal, then align yourself with this prime motivator. Once you begin to act and speak with the sentiments of the people in mind, you will gradually influence them. This type of PENETRATING INFLUENCE is not rousing and takes much time, but it makes a lasting and profound impression.

Similarly, only with gradual influence can you further develop your personal relationships. Sweeping gestures and emphatic declarations will only create distance. The time requires patience, a long-term commitment, and a vision of what you ultimately wish to accomplish. The improvement of your emotional and physical health will now come with gradual refinement.

The power of the mind through concentration is enhanced during the time of PENETRATING INFLUENCE. Great men accomplish significant deeds through an enduring effort in a consistent direction. When you wish to achieve an important aim, direct your thoughts along a steady, uninterrupted course. Know at all times your goal. In this way events that capture your attention will be relevant to where you are going, and all subsequent actions will lead you ever closer to your goal.

 

 

# CHAPTER 58: **ENCOURAGING (JOY)** 

The time has come when you can achieve your aims through the encouragement of others. Encouragement is one of the great powers over men. It can inspire them to the heights of co-operation, even to the point of transcending the fear of death itself. When ENCOURAGING others, you yourself must have in your heart a firm knowledge of the uncompromised truth, Then you may show kindness and gentleness in your ms pleasant mood brings allegiance, co-operation, and, ultimatelys success. Be cautioned, however, not to allow the situation to degenerate into uncontrolled gaiety or false optimism. The firm truth should always be at the center.

Social functions will be highlighted now. In these situations, your encouragement and kindness will win the hearts of your friends, leading the way to significant social achievements. This is not the time to be critical and opinionated. Don't be fooled by the immediate and striking effect that intimidation has over others. It wears off quickly and leaves behind only unpleasant associations. Instead, strive to create accord within your society by ENCOURAGING others in the pursuits of their individual goals.

If ever there were an audience for that charismatic and exceptional leader among men, it exists now. In business and political affairs, friendliness, kindness, and expansiveness toward others will create a spirit unparalleled in loyalty. Followers will take upon themselves all manner of hardship and sacrifice toward the attainment of worthwhile goals, and at the same time they will take extraordinary pleasure and pride in their work; thus the entire situation becomes beneficial for all concerned. It is necessary only that the leader have firmness and correctness within and an ENCOURAGING attitude toward others.

In personal relationships you have the opportunity to communicate more deeply than ever before. A strong understanding coupled with an attitude of goodwill can bring progress to your relationships. If you are involved in teaching those dear to you, an ENCOURAGING presentation of information will achieve a great deal. Remember your goals, however, and do not become frivolous or lose yourself in the joy of the moment.

Generally, the time of ENCOURAGING is best spent in discussion with others. Communications are greatly enhanced, and you now have the opportunity to enter into deep and open philosophical accord with your fellow man. You may openly examine your principles and gauge their effectiveness. Test your ideals. Explore the deepest strata of your feelings. Discuss this with others and learn what you can from them. Look for the thread of truth that extends through all things. In this way, dogma and habitual thinking fall away, and your character becomes multifaceted and refreshing.

 

# CHAPTER 59: **REUNITING (DISPERSION)**

All civilizations have experienced that powerful moment in time when the separatist factions among the people dissolve into the general enthusiasm and commitment to a common cause. Although rare and extraordinary, these times are deeply significant in both the development of the civilization and the well-being of the individual. American statesman Benjamin Franklin best expressed the exceptional time of REUNITING when he said, "We must all hang together or assuredly we shall all hang separately."

All cultures conduct social, political, and religious rituals. They strive for spiritual togetherness in order to break up dissension and reunite the hearts and minds of the people. Take whatever steps are necessary at this time to reunite yourself with your social milieu. It is time to break up that which divides, for isolation brings discord and blocks creative energy. You must devote yourself to a cause or task of some real significance in the world, or perhaps participate in an event that brings together the members of the community. There should definitely exist an emotional atmosphere within this mutual partaking.

Those involved in creative projects should now concern themselves with communicating. Shun elitism or egotism in your work, lest you lose the true thread of creativity. Look for the symbols, rhythms, and patterns that have inspired men for all times, and incorporate them into your work. Make a sincere attempt to meet the social responsibility of the artist: REUNITING people with their reality. This would hold true in all worldly matters. Strive, now, to offer products and services that are functional and appealing tb the widest possible audience.

This is a particularly important time in personal relationships and within the family. The family is a direct reflection of society, being the smallest social unit. A society or family that forgets where it came from cannot know where it is going. Without a periodic renewal and REUNITING among the members of the family, through the practice of family traditions, religious ritual or family recreation, the members drift ever farther from one another, losing touch with their roots. These relationships are the most important you will have in your life. Therefore, if you are estranged, make an effort to transcend the things that divide you from others. Focus on issues that may bring everyone together in mutual accord.

Within the Self, the time of REUNITING is directly connected to your spiritual development. You should now renew your inner faith, in whatever way that has meaning for you. Through Self-knowledge, reacquaint yourself with your true, heartfelt origins, and reunite your Self with your source.

 

# CHAPTER 60: **LIMITATIONS**

The most ancient and basic concern of mankind is that of regulating production and consumption within the dictates of nature, Therefore LIMITATIONS were created to preserve civilizations, Perhaps the first book of law was the calendar. The changing seasons create time and order in the consciousness of life, which, in turn, balances itself with the limits in its environment. These LIMITATIONS in all of nature give meaning to life and to the individual lives of men.

Thrift is especially important now. Limit expenditures and investments, whether they are made with money, energy, or emotions. In general, it is wise to avoid any excess in behavior, from blind loyalty on one hand to apathy on the other. If you are contemplating a radical reform or an indifferent retreat, you are not in harmony with the times.

The establishment of regulations or organizations that limit extravagant practices is in order. Set LIMITATIONS in business interests as well. Although these restrictions can be bothersome, it is a wise plan given the current economic atmosphere. Make certain your position is consolidated should difficulties come. In this way, you and your associates will be protected during changes in the economic climate. However, do not carry the idea of limitation too far, or you may create unhappy relations. Put limits upon your LIMITATIONS as well.

Curb extremes in personal relationships — extremes in promises, projections and passions. Accept your loved ones for themselves, and your rela •onships will strengthen. If you have gone too far in restricting others, you wil cause only rebelliousness and unpleasantness. Instead set limits upon the extent of your attachments.

Artists and those involved in self-expression now need LIMITATIONS to rise to their full creative potential. Restraints and limits are connected to personal destiny and should be explored and accepted constructively. LIMITATIONS bring morality to character development and significance to the expression of the Self. By setting guidelines and principles for yourself, you can successfully accomplish something of true meaning. Without limitation, you're overwhelmed by possibilities, moving from one thing to the next, never able to make a true commitment to anything. Make it a point now to discover your personal inclinations and LIMITATIONS, and you will discover the path to fulfillment. Be cautioned, however, not to allow your limitations to bind you, or worse, become an excuse for sedentary behavior. Use them as the natural regulations leading to health and great personal achievement.

 

# CHAPTER 61: **INSIGHT (INNER TRUTH)**

Ime time calls for achievements of consequence through the power of INSIGHT. To bring about INSIGHT. it is necessary to confidently rely upon the inner strength and correctness of your character while allowing the forces in your current situation to fully act upon you. In this way you establish direct contact so that you may comprehend these forces and gain advantage over them. This idea can be compared to the Chinese tnartial art T'ai Chi Ch'uan, where you yield to your opponent in order to receive his power and understand his direction. You then know where and when to direct a corresponding effort to overpower him. The object here is to co-ordinate your forces so that there is a minimum of conflict and a maximum of effect. Masters of this art often say: One uses four ounces to deflect one thousand pounds.

In yielding to the object of your inquiry, become totally open and unprejudiced toward its true nature. Go beyond objectivity into pure observation and acceptance. Here you've allowed your mind to be fully influenced by what you've observed and experienced. Now stop. Pull back into your character, your principles, your Self, taking with you a penetrating understanding and INSIGHT based upon actual experience. Think of it as embodying another's spirit, or as putting yourself in another's place. You will not lose your perspective or jeopardize your principles in this empathetic voyage. Instead you gain a valuable INSIGHT into something that may be, in fact, controlling a part of your life. This INSIGHT is a great advantage. You will know the right words to utter, the necessary yet minimal action to take, the proper attitudes to maintain in order to actually shape events.

In relationships, base your camaraderie or friendship upon higher truths than simple interactions or idle pleasures. This will create firm and lasting bonds. Generally, it is an excellent time for establishing meaningful rapport with those around you and using energies thus exchanged for achieving significant deeds. Remember that in all matters a correct and virtuous attitude is necessary to prevent a distorted INSIGHT brought about by guile and unreality. Once you've gained INSIGHT it is not necessary to take radical or violent steps to bring about harmony or justice. A few compassionate yet well-directed words can accomplish more at this time.

By developing INSIGHTyou will ultimately create in yourself a character trait of true value, which will facilitate your dealings with all aspects of your environment. It is a natural accord with the cosmos that is enhanced at this time. With INSIGHTyou may now lead others with true vision, or choose to live your life quietly and in good health, with little interference and remarkable richness of experience.

 

# CHAPTER 62: **CONSCIENTIOUSNESS (PREPONDERANCE OF THE SMALL)**

You must now be as conscientious as possible in your dealings with the outside world. Your sense of timing has never been more important to you. Self-control and attention to detail are the character traits that will allow you to accomplish your aims. This is not the time to ascend to the heights of your dreams. Attend to day-today matters and do not overlook anything.

In matters of power and politics, it is possible that you are moving into a far more responsible position than you are really suited for. Pay particular attention to the handling of your affairs. Do not let anything slip by unnoticed, and especially do not be rebellious or outspoken. This is not a time for great endeavors. Instilling in yourself a CONSCIENTIOUSNESS toward duties and responsibilities will bring you good fortune.

Keep a close watch over all financial interactions. Be conservative in your expenditures. If you are looking for extraordinary profits or considering daring investments, you are out of alignment with the cosmos. Do not allow yourself to be blinded by prospects of fantastic gains. Bring a little dignity and CONSCIENTIOUSNESS into your affairs with the commercial world. It is on this path that you will find success.

In your relationships with others you will find your best advantages in following established social guidelines. Any attempts at flamboyance will meet with disaster. Simple, heartfelt emotions will bring you into harmony with your milieu, whereas pretensions or ostentatious behavior will put you into a dangerous position. Social courtesy is the key that will unlock the door to success.

This may not be the most profound moment you have experienced emotionally. You may in fact find your hands full of trivial emotional concerns. Yet you will be rewarded for taking the time to ponder these delicate and sometimes dramatic feelings. Adhere to safe, pre-established roles at this time and avoid excessive displays of emotion while holding an awareness of your true feelings.

Your inner development requires some personal humility. Any manifestation of pride may lead you away from important insights. The forces now at work are not sympathetic to ambitious individual endeavors. The situation might be compared to the mythological flight of Icarus. His attempt to fly with wax wings to the height of the sun met with disfavor and disaster as his wings melted and he fell to earth. You will find good fortune if you stay low and perform your life's work with CONSCIENTIOUSNESS and personal dignity.

 

# CHAPTER 63: **AFTER THE END**

A state of perfect equilibrium has been reached. Everything seems to be in the best of order. The transition is complete and you are inclined to relax and become complacent. This tendency is what you may expect to experience AFTER THE END or climax of a phase. The situation reflects a familiar historical pattern: After a civilization's exhilarating climb to its glorious peak, decline begins; apathy and irresponsibility appear in everyday affairs, important social bonds weaken, decadence and corruption may be found in areas once thought to be above reproach.

Although the general tendency is moving toward the less than ideal, you can utilize this coming change in circumstance to develop inner-caution and fortification. Such virtues can alert you to situations that must be avoided or dispensed with quickly and firmly. Make it a point to take care of details as they arise. The successful outcome of small efforts is indicated. You cannot avoid the decline that comes AFTER THE END, yet you can learn to survive such times and emerge strengthened in spirit and character.

Above all, do not try to maintain the illusion of the ideal that exists now. You will be deluding only yourself, a deception that is surely dangerous. Such an attitude is not in harmony with the cosmos and will greatly confuse your timing, leaving you open and vulnerable to chaos.

Social and interpersonal relationships may develop problems. These can be endured if precautions are taken. If you know in advance that you will be faced with emotional difficulties you will not be rendered helpless by their impact. Those engaged in business or political affairs should be particularly cautioned. This is not a simple decline, as in hexagram No. 41, DECLINE. It is the time AFTER THE END of what has been a long-term tendency. Careers that are at their apex may undergo a major transition; long-established processes or products could be eclipsed. Fortify yourself with the knowledge that with forethought and preparation even absolute change can be successfully endured.

Exercise caution in your attitude toward the subject of your inquiry so as to ease your way through any coming difficulties. If anything can possibly go wrong, it will. Your vigilance and attention can arm you against misfortune.

 

 

# CHAPTER 64:**BEFORE THE END**

The accomplishment of a goal is in sight. It appears that long-impending matters may be brought to fruition with an acceptable amount of effort. Increasing clarity surrounds the meaning of situations once thought to be obscure. At the time BEFORE THE END there is great promise for the future.

A unique and sage viewpoint is present in human affairs. Order can be brought to chaotic situations. Because you are now unusually familiar with the elements involved in the object of your inquiry, you can evaluate and arrange them in whatever way necessary to achieve your aim. It should be a relatively simple matter to bring together groups of people in social or public-minded situations. By penetrating the psyche of each individual involved, you can arrange to gratify their needs within the group mechanism and thereby gain their co-operation. Clearly, if you are considering political advancement or business investments, the vantage point of the time BEFORE THE END should provide you with an artful approach.

Yet, it would be a mistake to imagine that by achieving your aim you will bring matters to a close, that good judgment and order will prevail. The time BEFORE THE END can be compared to a lengthy trek over a high mountain. At some point, before reaching the peak, you can see in detail exactly how much farther you must travel. You will know what is involved in reaching the top because of your experience in the climb so far. However, when you do reach the peak, which has been in your sight for many long days of effort, you will have done only that. You will have acquired little information and no experience whatsoever about descending the other side. To rush up and over the top in an overly confident manner could bring disaster.

The text of The Book of Change warns at some length, in this hexagram, of the dangers of proceeding without caution immediately BEFORE THE END. You must prepare yourself with wariness and reserve. The coming situation will be strange to you in every way, unlike any that you have experienced. In the near future you will not be able to draw upon the wealth of your acquired experience, for in many ways the time will be nothing short of a rebirth.

The idea of rebirth here is a key to the meaning of the I Ching as a whole. The book ends with a new beginning, cycling back to the first hexagram, CREATIVE POWER, forever and ever into eternity.

 

 